FULFILLING  THE  POTENTIAL  OF

WOMEN  IN  ACADEMIC  SCIENCE  AND

ENGINEERING  ACT  OF  2008

HEARING

BEFORE THE

SUBCOMMITTEE ON RESEARCH AND

SCIENCE EDUCATION

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND

TECHNOLOGY

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS

SECOND  SESSION

MAY  8,  2008

Serial No. 110–100

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology

(

Available  via  the  World  Wide  Web:  http://www.science.house.gov

42–121PS

WASHINGTON  : 

2008

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

COMMITTEE  ON  SCIENCE  AND  TECHNOLOGY

HON.  BART  GORDON,  Tennessee,  Chairman

JERRY  F.  COSTELLO,  Illinois
EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
LYNN  C.  WOOLSEY,  California
MARK  UDALL,  Colorado
DAVID  WU,  Oregon
BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington
BRAD  MILLER,  North  Carolina
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
NICK  LAMPSON,  Texas
GABRIELLE  GIFFORDS,  Arizona
JERRY  MCNERNEY,  California
LAURA  RICHARDSON,  California
PAUL  KANJORSKI,  Pennsylvania
DARLENE  HOOLEY,  Oregon
STEVEN  R.  ROTHMAN,  New  Jersey
JIM  MATHESON,  Utah
MIKE  ROSS,  Arkansas
BEN  CHANDLER,  Kentucky
RUSS  CARNAHAN,  Missouri
CHARLIE  MELANCON,  Louisiana
BARON  P.  HILL,  Indiana
HARRY  E.  MITCHELL,  Arizona
CHARLES  A.  WILSON,  Ohio

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas
F.  JAMES  SENSENBRENNER  JR.,

Wisconsin

LAMAR  S.  SMITH,  Texas
DANA  ROHRABACHER,  California
ROSCOE  G.  BARTLETT,  Maryland
VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
FRANK  D.  LUCAS,  Oklahoma
JUDY  BIGGERT,  Illinois
W.  TODD  AKIN,  Missouri
JO  BONNER,  Alabama
TOM  FEENEY,  Florida
RANDY  NEUGEBAUER,  Texas
BOB  INGLIS,  South  Carolina
DAVID  G.  REICHERT,  Washington
MICHAEL  T.  MCCAUL,  Texas
MARIO  DIAZ-BALART,  Florida
PHIL  GINGREY,  Georgia
BRIAN  P.  BILBRAY,  California
ADRIAN  SMITH,  Nebraska
PAUL  C.  BROUN,  Georgia

SUBCOMMITTEE ON RESEARCH AND SCIENCE EDUCATION

HON.  BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington,  Chairman

EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
JERRY  MCNERNEY,  California
DARLENE  HOOLEY,  Oregon
RUSS  CARNAHAN,  Missouri
BARON  P.  HILL,  Indiana
BART  GORDON,  Tennessee

VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
ROSCOE  G.  BARTLETT,  Maryland
RANDY  NEUGEBAUER,  Texas
DAVID  G.  REICHERT,  Washington
BRIAN  P.  BILBRAY,  California

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas

JIM  WILSON  Subcommittee  Staff  Director

DAHLIA  SOKOLOV  Democratic  Professional  Staff  Member
MELE´ WILLIAMS  Republican  Professional  Staff  Member

BESS  CAUGHRAN  Research  Assistant

(II)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

C O N T E N T S

May  8,  2008

Witness List .............................................................................................................
Hearing Charter ......................................................................................................

Page
2
3

Opening  Statements

Statement  by  Representative  Brian  Baird,  Chairman,  Subcommittee  on  Re-
search  and  Science  Education,  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology,  U.S.
House of Representatives ....................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Statement  by  Representative  Vernon  J.  Ehlers,  Ranking  Minority  Member,
Subcommittee  on  Research  and  Science  Education,  Committee  on  Science
and Technology, U.S. House of Representatives ...............................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Prepared Statement by Representative Eddie Bernice Johnson, Member, Sub-
committee  on  Research  and  Science  Education,  Committee  on  Science  and
Technology, U.S. House of Representatives .......................................................
Prepared  Statement  by  Representative  Russ  Carnahan,  Member,  Sub-
committee  on  Research  and  Science  Education,  Committee  on  Science  and
Technology, U.S. House of Representatives .......................................................

Witnesses:

Dr. Lynda T. Carlson, Director, Division of Science Resources Statistics (SRS),

National Science Foundation (NSF)

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Dr. Linda G. Blevins, Senior Technical Advisor, Office of the Deputy Director

for Science Programs, U.S. Department of Energy

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Dr.  Donna  K.  Ginther,  Associate  Professor,  Department  of  Economics;  Direc-

tor, Center for Economic and Business Analysis, University of Kansas

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Discussion .................................................................................................................

Appendix  1:  Answers  to  Post-Hearing  Questions

Dr. Lynda T. Carlson, Director, Division of Science Resources Statistics (SRS),
National Science Foundation (NSF) ...................................................................
Dr. Linda G. Blevins, Senior Technical Advisor, Office of the Deputy Director
for Science Programs, U.S. Department of Energy ...........................................
Dr.  Donna  K.  Ginther,  Associate  Professor,  Department  of  Economics;  Direc-
tor, Center for Economic and Business Analysis, University of Kansas .........

(III)

9
9

9
10

10

11

12
13
16

16
17
21

22
23
29
29

40

41

42

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

IV

Appendix  2:  Additional  Material  for  the  Record

Discussion Draft of the Fulfilling the Potential of Women in Academic Science
and Engineering Act of 2008 ...............................................................................
Letter to The Honorable Eddie Bernice Johnson from Lisa M. Maatz, Director
of  Public  Policy  and  Government  Relations,  the  American  Association  of
University Women, dated May 7, 2008 ..............................................................
Letter  to  The  Honorable  Eddie  Bernice  Johnson  from  Lisa  M.  Maatz,  Chair,
National  Coalition  for  Women  and  Girls  in  Education,  and  Jocelyn  Sam-
uels, Vice Chair, NCWGE, dated May 7, 2008 ..................................................

Page

44

53

54

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

FULFILLING  THE  POTENTIAL  OF  WOMEN  IN
ACADEMIC  SCIENCE  AND  ENGINEERING
ACT  OF  2008

THURSDAY,  MAY  8,  2008

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES,

SUBCOMMITTEE ON RESEARCH AND SCIENCE EDUCATION,

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY,

Washington, DC.

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  call,  at  10:00  a.m.,  in  Room
2318  of  the  Rayburn  House  Office  Building,  Hon.  Brian  Baird
[Chairman of the Subcommittee] presiding.

(1)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

2

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

3

HEARING CHARTER

SUBCOMMITTEE ON RESEARCH AND SCIENCE

EDUCATION

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY

U.S. HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

Fulfilling the Potential of

Women in Academic Science and

Engineering Act of 2008

THURSDAY, MAY 8, 2008

10:00 A.M.–12:00 P.M.

2318 RAYBURN HOUSE OFFICE BUILDING

1. Purpose

On  October  17,  2007,  the  Research  and  Science  Education  Subcommittee  held  a
hearing  on  Women  in  Academic  Science  and  Engineering,  during  which  we  exam-
ined  institutional  and  cultural  barriers  to  recruitment  and  retention  of  women  fac-
ulty  in  science  and  engineering  fields,  best  practices  for  overcoming  these  barriers,
and the role that federal research agencies can play in disseminating and promoting
best practices.

On  Thursday,  May  8,  the  Subcommittee  will  hold  a  hearing  to  obtain  comments
on  a  draft  bill  that  would  provide  for  federal  programs  to  address  the  needs  dis-
cussed in the previous hearing.

2. Witnesses

• Dr.  Lynda  T.  Carlson,  Director  of  the  Division  of  Science  Resource  Statis-
tics,  Directorate  for  Social,  Behavioral  and  Economic  Sciences,  National
Science Foundation.

• Dr.  Linda  G.  Blevins,  Senior  Technical  Advisor  in  the  Office  of  the  Deputy

Director for Science Programs, Office of Science, Department of Energy.

• Dr. Donna K. Ginther, Associate Professor of Economics and Director of the
Center  for  Economic  and  Business  Analysis,  Institute  for  Policy  Research,
University of Kansas.

3. Overarching Questions

• What  are  the  elements  of  an  effective  program  of  workshops  to  educate  par-
ticipants  about  gender  bias  in  academic  science  and  engineering  and  to  pro-
vide  them  with  strategies  to  overcome  such  bias?  By  what  metrics  should
such workshops be evaluated?

• What  demographics  data  do  federal  science  agencies  already  collect  in  their
grant  making  processes?  What  demographics  data  do  universities  collect  on
their faculty search and hiring, tenure review and promotion processes? What
data  are  needed  to  better  understand  and  track  gender  disparities  in  aca-
demic science and engineering?

• Does the proposed legislation adequately address the federal role in programs
and policies to help overcome cultural and institutional barriers to gender eq-
uity in academic science and engineering?

4. Overview

• Although women earn half of the Bachelor’s degrees in science and engineer-
ing  (S&E),  they  continue  to  be  significantly  under-represented  at  the  faculty
level  in  almost  all  S&E  fields,  constituting  30  percent  (in  2006)  of  full-time
doctoral science and engineering faculty at U.S. colleges and universities and
only 19 percent of full professors.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

4

• In 2006, the National Academies produced a report entitled, Beyond Bias and
Barriers: Fulfilling the Potential of Women in Academic Science and Engineer-
ing. The National Academies panel, in addition to dismissing the relative sig-
nificance  of  any  biological  differences  (in  response  to  former  Harvard  Presi-
dent Lawrence Summers’ February 2005 remarks on this topic), made a series
of  recommendations  to  all  stakeholders,  including  universities,  professional
societies  and  the  Federal  Government,  to  address  cultural  and  institutional
gender bias in academic S&E.

• On October 17, 2007, the Research and Science Education Subcommittee held
a  hearing  on  Women  in  Academic  Science  and  Engineering  in  which  we  ex-
plored  broadly  the  findings  and  recommendations  of  the  National  Academies
panel. Sections 5 and 6 below are taken directly from the 2007 hearing char-
ter, except for updates where more recent data have become available.

• Today the Subcommittee will receive comments on draft legislation that incor-
porates  several  of  the  recommendations  from  the  National  Academies  panel
that were also discussed during the previous hearing, including workshops to
increase  awareness  of  implicit  gender  bias  in  grant  review,  hiring,  tenure,
promotion, and selection for other honors based on merit; extended grant sup-
port  for  caregivers;  and  improved  demographic  data  collection  on  federal
grant-making.

5. Current Status of Women in Academic Science and Engineering

According  to  data  compiled  by  NSF,  in  2006,  women  held  30  percent  of  all  full-
time  science  and  engineering  (S&E)  faculty  positions  at  U.S.  colleges  and  univer-
sities. Specifically, they constituted 19 percent of full professors, 34 percent of asso-
ciate  professors  and  42  percent  of  junior  professors,  a  category  that  includes  both
instructors at two-year colleges and assistant professors at four-year institutions.

As seen in this figure from the Beyond Bias and Barriers report, most of the social
science  disciplines  and  psychology  are  already  dominated  by  women  at  both  the
graduate level and in faculty positions. The percentage of women earning Ph.D.s in
other S&E fields has grown steadily in the last 30 years, and has already exceeded
50  percent  in  the  life  sciences.  However,  in  2003  women  constituted  34  percent  of
assistant  professor  appointments  in  the  life  sciences,  and  slightly  less  at  research
universities.  Half  of  this  drop-off  can  be  accounted  for  by  including  only  the  avail-
able pool of Ph.D.s1 in the life sciences: 42 percent in 2003. But attrition is still high
in  the  step  from  completion  of  training  to  faculty  appointment.  Female  under-rep-
resentation  in  life  sciences  faculties  continues  through  the  associate  and  full  pro-
fessor  levels.  Notably,  while  the  physical  sciences  continue  to  have  low  representa-
tion  at  the  graduate  level  (20  percent),  relative  to  the  available  pool  of  Ph.D.s  the
physical sciences actually show better representation for women in tenure-track fac-
ulty  positions  than  the  life  sciences  and  other  fields  with  a  greater  percentage  of
women Ph.D.s.

1 In  the  case  of  assistant  professor  appointments,  the  available  pool  is  the  sum  of  Ph.D.s

earned by women in the six-year period preceding appointment.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

5

We  present  the  2003  data  in  this  charter  because  those  data  were  analyzed  and
presented  in  a  way  that  more  recent  data  have  not  been.  However,  since  the  last
hearing, NSF has published 2006 data as part of Science and Engineering Indicators
2008.  From  2003  to  2006,  the  representation  of  women  in  full-time  senior  faculty
positions  (associate  and  full  professors)  at  all  universities  has  increased  by  one  to
two percent in all of the major natural sciences fields—where chemistry is included
in  physical  sciences—and  by  just  under  one  percent  in  engineering.  Not  surpris-
ingly,  psychology  and  the  social  sciences  saw  slightly  larger  increases,  but  in  no
S&E field other than psychology do women represent more than 30 percent of senior
faculty positions.

Women who start out on academic pathways in S&E fields leave for other career
paths  at  higher  rates  than  their  male  counterparts,  even  though  for  the  fields  in
which attrition is highest, women show increased representation at the post-doctoral
level.  Post-doctoral  positions  are  a  necessary  prerequisite  to  faculty  jobs  in  most
S&E  fields.  From  among  those  who  leave  post-faculty  appointment  but  pre-tenure
review, men are more likely to move into other employment sectors and women are
more likely to move into adjunct positions. However, in most fields, women and men
faculty  who  are  reviewed  receive  tenure  at  similar  rates.  As  faculty  move  up  in

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

6

rank, there are again differences between men and women, this time in promotions,
awards and even salary.

6. Institutional and Cultural Bias and Barriers

In  2006,  the  National  Academies  produced  a  report  entitled,  Beyond  Bias  and
Barriers:  Fulfilling  the  Potential  of  Women  in  Academic  Science  and  Engineering.
The report was largely in response to the outcry over then Harvard President Law-
rence  Summers’  2005  remarks,  in  which  he  attributed  what  many  thought  to  be  a
greatly exaggerated level of significance to a biological explanation for female under-
representation in academic S&E. The NAS panel reviewed the existing literature on
gender  differences  in  cognition  and  biology  and  concluded  that,  ‘‘if  systematic  dif-
ferences  between  male  and  female  scientific  and  mathematical  aptitude  and  ability
do  exist,  it  is  clear  that  they  cannot  account  for  women’s  under-representation  in
academic  science  and  engineering.’’ 2 Instead,  the  panel  focused  on  the  need  to  fix
institutional, social and cultural bias and barriers.

To  this  end,  the  National  Academies  panel  made  a  number  of  recommendations
to  all  stakeholders.  The  panel  called  on  university  presidents  and  provosts  to  pro-
vide clear leadership in changing the culture and structure of their institutions, and
deans and department chairs to take responsibility for implementing changes to re-
cruiting,  hiring,  promotion,  and  tenure  practices.  They  recommended  that  higher
education  organizations  form  an  inter-institution  monitoring  organization  and  that
scientific and professional societies help set professional and equity standards across
the  activities  they  lead,  such  as  awards  and  conferences.  The  recommendations
made to the Federal Government ranged from rigorous enforcement of federal anti-
discrimination  laws  by  enforcement  agencies,  to  better  data  collection,  to  provision
of  workshops  to  minimize  gender  bias  by  NSF  and  other  federal  funding  agencies.
The  full  list  of  recommendations  is  in  the  report  summary:  http://books.nap.edu/
catalog.php?record¥id=11741.

The status of women in academic S&E has improved appreciably in the last three
decades,  and  institutions  across  the  country  are  continuing  to  address  institutional
barriers  to  gender  equity.  However,  the  National  Academies  panel  argues  that
changes in institutional policies are necessary but not sufficient—even many policies
that  appear  on  the  surface  to  be  equitable  in  fact  disadvantage  women.  For  exam-
ple,  many  women  who  want  children  struggle  with  the  intersection  of  the  tenure
clock  and  their  biological  clock.  Many  more  men  are  also  making  work/life  balance
career  decisions.3 In  order  to  attract  top  faculty  candidates  who  want  both  career
and family, a number of universities offer the possibility of an extension of the ten-
ure clock—the number of years to tenure review—for assistant professors who have
a  child  while  under  the  clock.  But  in  most  cases  young  faculty  feel  pressure  not  to
request this extension for fear that they will be judged differently in the tenure re-
view  process.  In  this  case,  cultural  norms  undermine  a  well-intentioned  policy,  and
women,  who  are  more  often  the  primary  caregivers  for  infants  (especially  if  they
breast feed), are disproportionably disadvantaged. Some universities have instituted
an  automatic  rather  than  voluntary  extension  of  the  tenure  clock  in  an  attempt  to
overcome those cultural barriers.

The  report  also  discusses  at  length  a  phenomenon  known  as  ‘‘implicit  bias,’’  in
this  case  an  implicit  assumption  of  what  a  scientist  is  supposed  to  look  like,  i.e.,
a man, and probably a white man. The panel cites a Swedish4 study of peer-review
scores,  in  which  men  received  systematically  higher  competence  ratings  by  their
peers than equally productive women. In fact, women post-doctoral fellowship appli-
cants included in that study had to be twice as productive (as measured by defined,
quantitative  measures  of  productivity)  than  their  male  counterparts  to  be  judged
equally  competent.  A  similar  claim  has  just  been  reported  in  Nature  News  by  a
woman physicist who was a post-doctoral fellow at DOE’s Fermi Lab in Illinois until
2005.5 This  field  of  research  is  still  relatively  young,  but  the  collection  of  evidence
supporting  the  notion  of  implicit  gender  bias  in  academic  S&E  continues  to  grow.
Minority-group  women,  as  members  of  two  major  demographic  groups  historically
excluded from the scientific enterprise, face their own unique set of challenges.

The  list  of  cultural  norms  that  appear  to  disadvantage  women  also  includes  the
favoring  of  disciplinary  over  interdisciplinary  research  and  publications,  and  the
only  token  attention  given  to  teaching  and  other  service  during  the  tenure  review

2 Critics of the NAS report disparage the panel for dismissing the significance of biology before

all of the scientific evidence is in.

3 Currently,  42  percent  of  women  in  tenure  and  tenure-track  careers  have  children,  while  50

percent of their male colleagues have children.

4 Sweden has been named by the United Nations as a world leader in gender equity.
5 Nature News, Vol. 452, 24 April 2008, Pg. 918.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

7

process.6 Thus  it  seems  that  it  is  not  necessarily  conscious  bias  against  women  but
an  ingrained  idea  of  how  the  academic  enterprise  ‘‘should  be’’  that  presents  the
greatest  challenge  to  women  seeking  academic  S&E  careers.  Overcoming  these  cul-
tural barriers is much more difficult than just enforcing anti-discrimination laws or
making  university  policies  more  family  friendly.  And  even  among  those  who  pas-
sionately advocate for change, there is no consensus about how or if to modify some
of  those  core  practices  that  have  defined  the  academic  enterprise  for  generations.

7. Workshops on Gender Bias

In  January  2006,  officials  from  the  Department  of  Energy  (DOE),  NSF  and  Na-
tional  Institutes  of  Health  partnered  in  support  of  a  workshop  on  gender  bias  for
chemistry  department  chairs  from  across  the  country.  The  goal  for  this  conference
was  to  ‘‘develop  and  implement  strategies  to  significantly  increase  the  number  of
women  chemists  in  tenured  academic  positions  in  our  research  universities  and
eliminate  the  gender  biases  that  negatively  impact  their  career  progress.’’  In  addi-
tion to department chairs, participants included lab heads from DOE National Labs
and representatives of societies and federations. The workshop did result in a report
of the challenges and issues addressed.7 However, the federal agencies did not spon-
sor any long-term follow-up of the departments whose chairs participated. The phys-
ics  community  followed  with  a  similar  workshop  in  May  2007.8 Today’s  DOE  wit-
ness  participated  as  an  advisor  in  both  the  chemistry  and  physics  workshops  and
will address the elements of an effective workshop in addition to metrics for evalua-
tion.

8. Questions for Witnesses
Dr. Carlson

• The draft bill requires federal science agencies to collect annual composite in-
formation  on  demographics,  field,  award  type  and  budget  request,  review
score,  and  funding  outcome  for  all  applications  for  research  grants  to  univer-
sities  supported  by  those  agencies.  How  much  of  these  data  are  already  col-
lected  by  the  National  Science  Foundation  (NSF)  for  their  own  grants?  What
level  of  effort  and  resources  are  required  by  NSF  to  collect  all  of  the  data  as
listed in the draft?
• Assuming that the Director of the Office of Science and Technology Policy es-
tablished a uniform policy for collecting and reporting such data based on the
NSF  model,  what  level  of  effort  and  resources  would  be  required  of  NSF  to
store and publish the data from all of the federal science agencies?

Dr. Blevins

• Based  on  your  own  experience  in  helping  to  organize  workshops  to  address
gender  bias  in  the  chemistry  and  physics  communities  in  2006  and  2007,
what  are  the  elements  of  an  effective  workshop?  In  answering  this  question,
please  address  workshop  content,  format,  speakers,  and  participant  cat-
egories,  in  addition  to  any  other  elements  that  are  important  to  an  effective
workshop.
• What  metrics  should  be  used  to  evaluate  the  success  of  such  workshops  in
changing  individual  behavior  and  institutional  culture  related  to  gender  eq-
uity in academic science and engineering?
• Are  there  challenges  in  overcoming  gender  bias  that  are  unique  to  the  Na-
tional  Laboratories?  Should  the  workshops  have  sessions  that  are  tailored
specifically to National Laboratory participants?

Dr. Ginther

departments of science and engineering?

• What  data  are  needed  to  better  understand  gender  disparities  in  university
• The draft bill provides for a program of workshops on gender bias in academic
science  and  engineering.  What  are  the  elements  of  an  effective  workshop?  In
answering  this  question,  please  address  workshop  content,  format,  speakers,

6 While  the  reasons  are  unclear,  it  appears  that  women  are  more  likely  to  engage  in  inter-
disciplinary and collaborative research, and to put more energy and time into teaching and men-
toring activities than their male colleagues.

7 http://www.chem.harvard.edu/groups/friend/GenderEquityWorkshop/GenderEquity.pdf
8 http://www.aps.org/programs/women/workshops/gender-equity/index.cfm

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

8

and  participant  categories,  in  addition  to  any  other  elements  that  are  impor-
tant  to  an  effective  workshop.  What  metrics  should  be  used  to  evaluate  the
success  of  such  workshops  in  changing  individual  behavior  and  institutional
culture related to gender equity in academic science and engineering?
• The  draft  bill  requires  a  uniform  federal  policy  for  extending  the  period  of
grant  support  for  federally  funded  researchers  with  caregiving  responsibil-
ities.  Do  you  have  any  recommendations  for  what  such  a  policy  should  look
like?
• Does the proposed legislation adequately address the federal role in programs
and policies to help overcome cultural and institutional barriers to gender eq-
uity in academic science and engineering?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

9

Chairman BAIRD. I want to thank everyone for joining us for this
very  important  hearing  on  the  role  of  women  in  science  and  ways
we  can  continue  to  support  advanced  practice  among  women  in
science.  We  have  had  a  number  of  hearings  in  this  subcommittee
on  this.  My  dear  friend  and  Ranking  Member,  Dr.  Ehlers,  is  very
interested  in  it,  and  of  course,  Eddie  Bernice  Johnson,  the  author
of the legislation before us today is quite interested in this as well.
Under normal circumstances I would have a long statement writ-
ten  for  me  by  staff,  but  we  have  votes  on  the  Floor  possibly  fairly
early  this  morning,  and  in  the  interest  of  hearing  witnesses,  I  will
enter my own opening remarks into the record and would recognize
now Dr. Ehlers for comments if he wishes to make some.

[The prepared statement of Chairman Baird follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHAIRMAN BRIAN BAIRD

Good  morning  and  welcome  to  this  hearing  on  the  discussion  draft  of  Fulfilling
the  Potential  of  Women  in  Academic  Science  and  Engineering  Act  of  2008.  I  want
to thank my dear friend Ms. Johnson for bringing this important legislative proposal
before the Subcommittee.

According  to  NSF,  women  earned  more  than  half  of  all  science  and  engineering
Bachelor’s degrees in 2005, although they continue to earn only 20 percent in engi-
neering,  computer  science,  and  physics.  Similarly,  while  there  remain  considerable
differences  across  fields,  women  are  receiving  science  and  engineering  Ph.D.s  in
steadily  increasing  numbers.  However,  even  in  the  life  sciences  where  women  now
earn more than 50 percent of Ph.D.s, they hold only 30 percent of all associate and
full professor faculty positions—and that’s by far the highest number for all natural
science and engineering fields.

In  October  of  last  year,  we  held  a  hearing  on  Women  in  Academic  Science  and
Engineering  to  review  the  findings  and  recommendations  of  a  National  Academies
panel that carefully examined the reasons why the attrition rate for women in aca-
demic  science  and  engineering  continues  to  be  higher  than  for  men  at  every  step
along the academic pipeline.

The  panel  found  that  most  of  the  barriers  to  women  in  academia  are  not  created
with intent to discriminate. In fact, even policies that seem gender-neutral in theory
might not be so in practice. They recommended that federal science agencies sponsor
workshops  on  gender  bias  in  order  to  raise  awareness  of  and  provide  strategies  to
overcome  the  collective  effect  of  many  small  and  subtle  incidents  of  subconscious
bias  that  are  often  built  into  academic  culture.  The  draft  bill  under  consideration
creates a program of such workshops.

The National Academies panel also highlighted the need for better data collection,
to understand the extent of gender inequity and to have a basis for evaluating poli-
cies to address the gap. The draft bill therefore requires federal science agencies to
collect detailed demographic data on the grant making process, and encourages uni-
versities  to  collect  better  data  for  the  purposes  of  evaluating  the  gender  bias  work-
shops.

In today’s hearing we seek feedback on these and other provisions of the Fulfilling
the  Potential  of  Women  in  Academic  Science  and  Engineering  Act  of  2008.  We  also
welcome suggestions for other programs or language that we might consider includ-
ing.

We cannot afford to continue losing our best and brightest women from academic
science  and  engineering  careers.  The  programs  in  this  bill  are  a  small  but  critical
part  of  what  is  needed  to  tackle  the  barriers  that  women  face.  But  Congress  has
a limited role in helping to overcome what are ultimately cultural and institutional
barriers.  The  universities,  disciplinary  societies,  funding  agencies  and  other  stake-
holders  need  to  step  up  to  do  their  part,  and  I  am  happy  to  see  such  a  movement
starting to take hold.

I want to thank Congresswoman Johnson once again for her tireless work to pro-
mote  the  role  of  women  and  minorities  in  science  and  engineering.  I  thank  all  of
the witnesses for being here today and I look forward to your testimony.

Mr.  EHLERS.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  I  would  agree  on
that.  I  don’t  have  a  long  opening  statement.  I  have  a  short  one.
Nevertheless, I ask consent to enter it into the record and also just

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

10

want  to  thank  Dr.  Ginther  for  being  here.  I’ve  had  the  pleasure  of
talking to her on the telephone, persuaded her to come, and I very
much  look  forward  to  her  testimony.  I  am  sure  she  has  much  to
offer to this hearing.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Ehlers follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE VERNON J. EHLERS

Today  we  are  examining  legislation  introduced  by  my  colleague,  Congresswoman
Johnson from Texas, which addresses the biases and barriers women face in science
and engineering faculty departments. I thank Representative Johnson for preparing
this  thoughtful  legislation  and  appreciate  her  willingness  to  delve  into  the  details
and receive testimony from our witnesses today.

In  October  this  subcommittee  held  a  hearing  on  the  challenges  faced  by  female
faculty in science and engineering. Our witnesses were a dynamic group who spoke
about  the  institutional  changes  needed  and  highlighted  some  of  the  programs  the
Federal Government currently supports in this area. We learned that effective insti-
tutional  change  must  be  systemic,  and  that  sometimes  bias  hides  behind  even  the
simplest language used in recommendation letters.

Today we are going to talk about specific actions the Congress can take to address
these  biases.  I  hope  that  we  are  able  to  take  what  we  learn  from  our  witnesses
today  and  incorporate  some  of  their  ideas  into  the  final  legislation.  All  of  us  want
to ensure that equitable educational opportunities for women pursuing faculty posi-
tions are the norm and not the anomaly at U.S. colleges and universities. Important
to  this  effort  is  making  certain  that  we  have  a  good  understanding  of  the  current
situation  so  that  we  can  be  sure  that  federal  efforts  achieve  the  intended  impact.

I look forward to hearing from our witnesses today.
[The prepared statement of Ms. Johnson follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE EDDIE BERNICE JOHNSON

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. The National Academies report, Beyond Bias and Bar-
riers, provided clear guidelines to universities, federal agencies, professional organi-
zations and to Congress on what actions to take to reduce gender bias at the univer-
sity faculty level.

As the legislation has developed, there has been a faint expression of concern over

being heavy-handed with our scientists and universities.

One thing that I hope to learn from today’s hearing, as well as from feedback sub-
mitted  to  the  Science  Committee,  is  how  we  can  encourage  university  presidents
and  provosts  to  provide  clear  leadership  in  changing  the  culture  and  structure  of
their institutions, and deans and department chairs to take responsibility for imple-
menting changes to recruiting, hiring, promotion, and tenure practices.

Beyond  Bias  and  Barriers  also  recommended  that  higher  education  organizations
form  an  inter-institution  monitoring  organization,  and  that  scientific  and  profes-
sional  societies  help  set  professional  and  equity  standards  for  the  activities  that
they lead, such as awards and conferences.

I  have  attempted  to  incentivize  the  formation  of  such  an  inter-institution  moni-
toring  organization,  through  a  one-time  competitive  grant  through  the  Department
of Education’s Fund for the Improvement of Post-secondary Education.

The provision was accepted into the Higher Education Act, but during conference,

it was stripped out.

I am frustrated, Mr. Chairman, by the uphill battle in getting equality for women

when it comes to reaching the higher echelons of scientific achievement.

As  stated  in  Beyond  Bias  and  Barriers,  ‘‘if  systematic  differences  between  male
and female scientific and mathematical aptitude and ability do exist, it is clear that
they cannot account for women’s under-representation in academic science and engi-
neering.’’

While  I  do  not  intend  to  be  heavy-handed  toward  our  universities,  I  do  feel  that
not nearly enough is being done to educate persons of influence on the subtle gender
bias  that  exists  and  is  holding  women  back  from  achieving  at  the  same  level  as
men.

Why  have  our  federal  agencies  not  already  developed  institutional  policies  that

are sensitive to women scientists?

Why  is  there  no  federal  guideline  for  administrative  leave  for  the  purpose  of

caregiving?

Why  is  there  no  funding  mechanism  to  provide  for  interim  technical  or  adminis-

trative support during a leave of absence related to care giving?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

11

Why is there no centralized, federal policy to extend grant support time-tables for

researchers who take a care giving leave of absence?

What  are  federal  agencies  doing  to  protect  whistleblowers  who  speak  out  when

anti-discrimination laws are not enforced?

Why  is  NSF’s  Survey  of  Earned  Doctorates  suddenly  repressing  data  on  women

and minorities in science?

Mr. Chairman, for the record, I am submitting the most recent report, from 2006,
entitled, ‘‘2006 Doctorate Recipients from United States Universities: Summary Re-
port.’’ 1

Beginning with the very first data table, A–1, the NSF suppresses data when the

numbers are small—the reason given is to ‘‘protect confidentiality.’’

Look  for  yourselves.  The  data  suppression  begins  on  page  113,  and  it  stretches

all the way to page 174.

not worthy of publication.

Mr.  Chairman,  any  scientist  worth  her  salt  will  tell  you  that  incomplete  data  is

This is exactly the kind of practice that we must stop. I will fight this for as long

as I am in Congress and long afterwards.

I am also submitting an article from Inside Higher Education that highlights the
NSF’s  suppression  of  this  critical  data  on  women  and  minority  Ph.D.  attainment.
I  am  ashamed  that  the  NSF  has  suppressed  this  data.  I  hope  that  Jaqui  C.
Falkenheim, the NSF project manager for the survey, or whoever at that agency de-
cided that this was a good idea, will be told that they are wrong.

I  strongly  recommend  that  the  NSF  immediately  return  to  full  disclosure  of  data
reporting—even  if  the  numbers  are  embarrassingly  small—so  that  taxpayers,  in-
cluding  myself,  can  understand  the  complete  truth  about  the  sad  state  of  women
and minority achievement in the sciences in our nation.

With that said, I want to thank you, Mr. Chairman, and Ranking Member Ehlers,

for your attention to this bill.

I thank the Diversity & Innovation Caucus for pushing this issue as well.
I  thank  the  American  Association  of  University  Women,  National  Coalition  for
Women  and  Girls  in  Education,  the  Society  of  Women  Engineers,  the  National
Science  Teachers  Association,  the  American  Chemical  Society  and  others  for  sup-
porting this bill.

The  American  Association  of  University  Women  and  the  National  Coalition  for
Women  and  Girls  in  Education  have  both  written  support  letters,  and  I  ask  your
permission to also submit these for the record.

Thank you for your indulgence, Mr. Chairman. I yield back.
[The prepared statement of Mr. Carnahan follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE RUSS CARNAHAN

Mr. Chairman, thank you for hosting this important hearing on the role of gender

in science and engineering.

While  the  status  of  women  in  science  and  engineering  academia  has  improved
over the last three decades, there are still barriers to achieving gender equity. NSF
published 2006 data in Science and Engineering Indicators 2008 that demonstrated
some increases in women represented in full-time senior faculty positions at all uni-
versities. However, women represent no more than 30 percent of senior faculty posi-
tions in science and engineering fields other than psychology. This is an unfortunate
statistic  and  one  that  the  draft  legislation  under  the  Committee’s  consideration
today seeks to address.

One  of  the  proposals  included  are  workshops  to  increase  awareness  of  implicit
gender  bias  in  grant  review,  hiring,  tenure,  promotion,  and  selection  for  other  hon-
ors  based  on  merit.  I  realize  that  one  such  workshop  occurred  recently  at  the  De-
partment  of  Energy  and  look  forward  to  hearing  Dr.  Blevins’  opinions  about  the
workshop’s successes and/or failures.

I would like to thank today’s witnesses, Dr. Carlson, Dr. Blevins and Dr. Ginther.

I look forward to hearing all of our witness’s testimonies.

Chairman  BAIRD.  I  thank  all  of  the  witnesses.  Dr.  Ginther,  you
know  it  is  hard  to  turn  down  our  good  friend,  Dr.  Ehlers.  And  I

1 An  updated  version  of  the  2006  Doctorate  Recipients  from  United  States  Universities:  Sum-
mary Report is available at http://www.norc.org/projects/survey+of+earned+doctorates.htm. The
version of the report Representative Johnson refers to is available at the Science and Technology
Committee main office, located in Room 2321 of the Rayburn House Office Building.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

12

thank  all  our  witnesses.  And  with  that,  I  will  introduce  the  wit-
nesses so that we can begin the testimony.

Dr.  Lynda  T.  Carlson  is  the  Director  of  the  Division  of  Science
Resource  Statistics  in  the  Directorate  for  Social,  Behavioral  and
Economic  Sciences  at  the  National  Science  Foundation.  Dr.  Linda
G.  Blevins  is  Senior  Technical  Advisor  in  the  Office  of  the  Deputy
Director  for  Science  Programs  at  the  Department  of  Energy.  And
Dr. Donna K. Ginther, as introduced by Dr. Ehlers, is an Associate
Professor  of  Economics  and  the  Director  for  the  Center  for  Eco-
nomic  and  Business  Analysis  in  the  Institute  for  Policy  Research
at the University of Kansas.

As  our  witnesses  should  know,  we  ask  folks  to  limit  their  testi-
mony to five minutes and then we follow by questions. This is gen-
erally  a  friendly,  bipartisan  committee.  It  is  not  like  the  spooky
ones you see on TV. So we look forward to your comments, we will
have good discussion, and I thank you for being here.

Dr. Carlson.

STATEMENT OF DR. LYNDA T. CARLSON, DIRECTOR, DIVISION
OF  SCIENCE  RESOURCES  STATISTICS  (SRS),  NATIONAL
SCIENCE FOUNDATION (NSF)
Dr.  CARLSON.  Chairman  Baird,  Ranking  Member  Ehlers,  and
Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  I  am  Lynda  Carlson,  Director  of
NSF’s Division of Science Resources Statistics or SRS. I appreciate
the opportunity to appear before you today.

SRS is one of the 14 major statistical agencies, and our major re-
sponsibility  is  for  data  collection  and  analysis  related  to  the  entire
science  enterprise.  We  produce  biennial  Science  and  Engineering
Indicators as well as Women, Minorities and Persons with Disabil-
ities  in  Science  and  Engineering  reports.  NSF  cannot  support  the
proposed  legislation  as  the  data  collection  and  analysis  require-
ments will be excessive. Let me illustrate with these examples.

First,  NSF  itself  as  part  of  the  grants  process  currently  collects
annual  composite  information  on  demographics,  field,  award  type,
budget  request,  review  score,  and  funding  outcomes  for  all  of  its
proposals and awards. However, principal investigators, or PIs, are
not,  nor  can  they  be  required  to  provide  demographic  information
as  a  condition  of  obtaining  an  award  because  of  the  Privacy  Act.
Hence, the demographic information collected is incomplete. For ex-
ample, the number of PIs who submitted proposals and did not de-
clare  a  race  or  ethnicity  in  2007  was  nearly  as  large  as  those  who
provided  a  response.  And  over  the  last  10  years,  the  proportion  of
new principal investigators reporting their gender has declined.

Second, I will refer to some lessons we learned in conducting two
surveys that characterize R&D conducted in the federal sector, sur-
vey of Federal Funds for Research and Development and Survey of
Federal Science and Engineering Support to Universities, Colleges,
and  Nonprofit  Institutions.  For  these  surveys,  SRS  must  obtain
data  from  science  funding  agencies  on  the  type  of  activity  sup-
ported  and  on  the  funding  recipient.  It  has  been  increasingly  dif-
ficult for SRS to obtain high-quality data in a timely manner from
the  queried  agencies.  Agencies  do  not  usually  keep  detailed  infor-
mation  about  the  science  fields  that  they  support.  And  even  when

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

13

an agency does maintain data by field, it may not conform to SRS’s
data characterization system.

In  short,  different  agencies  maintain  their  records  in  quite  dif-
ferent ways to meet their particular needs, and SRS does not have
the  authority  to  require  funding  agencies  to  maintain  or  transfer
needed data.

As  a  result  of  such  issues,  SRS  commissioned  the  National  Re-
search  Council’s  Committee  on  National  Statistics  to  form  a  panel
and  hold  a  series  of  workshops  to  assist  us  in  revising  these  sur-
veys.  The  panel  was  recently  formed,  and  the  first  workshop  will
be  held  in  June  of  2008.  The  resulting  recommendations  are  ex-
pected to be released in early 2009.

A third and final example speaks to efforts to collect data on gen-
der.  The  NSF  Authorization  Act  of  2002  required  NSF  to  examine
differences  in  amounts  requested  and  award  by  gender  in  major
federal  external  grants.  SRS  contracted  with  the  RAND  Corpora-
tion  to  conduct  the  survey.  The  results  were  released  in  2005.  For
this  study  we  had  intended  to  collect  data  on  grants  by  gender
from NSF, USDA, all of HHS, and the Departments of Defense and
Energy.

Data  collection  was  only  feasible  from  NSF,  NIH,  and  USDA.
Adequate data on grants, applications, and awards were not avail-
able  for  the  Department  of  Defense  or  Energy  or  the  remainder  of
HHS.  From  this  effort  we  learned  that  better  tracking  of  gender
differences  will  require  that  all  agencies  maintain  a  data  system
that stores information on all grants and investigators and that all
agencies include key personnel characteristics for each investigator
in the application form, among other requirements.

Mr.  Chairman,  I  hope  that  these  examples  illustrate  the  com-
plexities of the data collection requirements called for in this legis-
lation.  The  Chief  Financial  Officer’s  Grants  Policy  Committee,
which  is  charged  with  oversight  of  government-wide  grants  policy
initiatives,  might  be  able  to  provide  additional  insight  into  such  a
data collection.

Thank you.
[The prepared statement of Dr. Carlson follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF LYNDA T. CARLSON

Chairman  Baird,  Ranking  Member  Ehlers,  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  I
am  Lynda  Carlson,  Director  of  the  Division  of  Science  Resources  Statistics  (SRS)
within  the  National  Science  Foundation  (NSF).  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  tes-
tify on Representative Johnson’s proposed legislation on gender biases and barriers.
However,  NSF  cannot  support  the  proposed  legislation  as  its  requirements  will  be
excessive as they exceed current data collection capabilities.

NSF’s Division of Science Resources Statistics (SRS)

The Division of Science Resources Statistics (SRS) is the federal statistical agency
responsible  for  data  collection  and  analysis  related  to  the  entire  science  and  engi-
neering (S&E) enterprise. The Division’s responsibilities include data collections and
analyses  related  to  the  S&E  workforce,  the  education  of  scientists  and  engineers,
and research and development (R&D), including federal funding of R&D. We annu-
ally  collect  data  on  R&D  in  academe  and  industry,  and  we  periodically  collect  data
on R&D funding activities by states and nonprofits. SRS staff is responsible for writ-
ing  and  producing  the  biennial  Science  and  Engineering  Indicators  report  for  the
National  Science  Board,  as  well  as  the  biennial  report  Women,  Minorities  and  Per-
sons  with  Disabilities  in  Science  and  Engineering,  which  is  required  under  Section
37 of the Science and Engineering Equal Opportunities Act.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

14

Data Collection on Grants Portfolio

NSF  currently  collects  annual  composite  information  on  demographics,  field,
award  type  and  budget  request,  review  score  and  funding  outcome  for  NSF  pro-
posals  and  awards.  NSF  publishes  a  summary  of  these  data  in  the  annual  Merit
Review Report, including principal investigator (PI) demographics on proposals and
awards. However, PIs are not, nor can they be, required to provide demographic in-
formation  because  of  the  Privacy  Act;  therefore,  the  demographic  information  col-
lected  is  incomplete.  For  example,  the  number  of  PIs  who  submitted  proposals  and
did  not  declare  a  race/ethnicity  in  2007  is  nearly  as  large  as  the  number  who  de-
clared  minority  status.  In  the  last  ten  years,  the  proportion  of  new  PIs  who  choose
to report their gender has been declining.

Furthermore,  the  process  for  collecting  and  correlating  review  scores  across  pro-
grams and directorates within NSF is complex. For example, differences in average
review scores across programs and field of research are as likely to reflect different
reviewer community norms as to reflect differences in the actual quality of proposals
received. Given the variety of review processes and scoring systems used throughout
Federal  Government,  coupled  with  the  complexity  of  correlating  scores  even  within
agencies,  it  would  be  virtually  impossible  for  SRS  to  provide  a  report  to  Congress
with review scores that are in any way comparable across the federal science agen-
cies.

Lessons Learned from Other SRS Surveys

Over  the  last  several  years,  SRS  has  been  in  the  process  of  redesigning  two  sur-
veys  that  characterize  R&D  conducted  in  the  federal  sector:  (1)  ‘‘Survey  of  Federal
Funds  for  Research  and  Development,’’  or  Federal  Funds  Survey;  and  (2)  ‘‘Survey
of Federal Science and Engineering Support to Universities, Colleges, and Nonprofit
Institutions,’’ or Federal Support Survey. The surveys are being redesigned to better
reflect how R&D is actually conducted in today’s economy. The redesign was guided
in  part  by  a  2005  study  that  SRS  commissioned  from  the  National  Research  Coun-
cil’s Committee on National Statistics (CNSTAT), entitled ‘‘Measuring Research and
Development Expenditures in the U.S. Economy.’’

For  the  two  aforementioned  surveys,  SRS  must  obtain  data  from  S&E  funding
agencies  on  the  type  of  activity  supported  and  on  the  recipient  of  the  funding,
among  other  indicators.  It  has  been  increasingly  difficult  for  SRS  to  obtain  high
quality  data  in  a  timely  manner  from  the  queried  agencies.  Moreover,  agencies  do
not  usually  keep  detailed  information  about  the  fields  of  S&E  that  they  support.
Further, even when the agency does maintain data by field, those data may not con-
form to SRS’s data categorization system. Different agencies maintain their records
in  quite  different  ways  to  meet  their  particular  needs  and  operating  procedures.
SRS  may  have  to  work  with  individual  agencies  for  significant  periods  of  time  to
obtain  more  comparable  data.  Because  of  poor  data  quality  and  incomplete  agency
reporting,  data  on  field  of  S&E  research  has  not  been  collected  as  part  of  the  Fed-
eral Support Survey since 1999.

In  response  to  the  issues  we  have  encountered  in  conducting  these  two  surveys,
SRS  has  commissioned  CNSTAT  to  form  a  panel  and  hold  a  series  of  workshops  to
assist  us  in  their  revision.  The  panel,  ‘‘Modernizing  the  Infrastructure  of  the  NSF
Federal  Funds  Survey,’’  was  recently  formed,  and  the  first  workshop  will  be  held
in June 2008. The panel’s report and recommendations, which may help streamline
data collection for SRS, are expected to be released in early 2009.

As  part  of  the  redesign  effort  for  another  SRS  survey  entitled,  ‘‘Survey  of  Re-
search  and  Development  Expenditures  at  Universities  and  Colleges,’’  issues  with
field of study data have been elucidated. Recent site visits to sixteen academic insti-
tutions have indicated that many academic institutions do not capture research field
of study at the proposal stage. Once a proposal has been funded, the ability to cap-
ture  the  field  of  study  for  individual  proposals  varies  considerably  across  institu-
tions  from  easy  to  quite  difficult.  Institutions  have  indicated  that  it  would  require
some effort to educate faculty on how to code their research by field, as the methods
are  not  straightforward,  especially  as  more  and  more  research  is  interdisciplinary.
Lastly, SRS is also revising the existing taxonomy(s) of Fields of Science in order
to  capture  new  and  emerging  fields.  SRS  is  developing  a  schema  to  revise  the  tax-
onomy  in  a  manner  that  would  allow  it  to  be  updated  on  a  continuous  basis.  We
expect this project to be finalized in two to three years. We will engage in significant
consultation with the other science funding agencies as part of this activity.

Lessons Learned from a Study of Grants by Gender

The  NSF  Authorization  Act  of  2002  required  NSF  to  ‘‘examine  differences  in
amounts requested and awarded, by gender, in major federal external grants.’’ SRS

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

15

contracted with the RAND Corporation to conduct the survey, and the results were
published  in  a  2005  report  entitled,  ‘‘Gender  Differences  in  Major  Federal  External
Grant Programs.’’

The  report  covered  several  federal  science  agencies,  or  federal  agencies  respon-
sible for at least two percent of federal R&D obligations to universities. We had in-
tended  that  the  study  collect  data  on  grants  by  gender  from  NSF,  the  Department
of Defense (DOD), the Department of Energy (DOE), the Department of Agriculture
(USDA),  and  the  National  Institutes  of  Health  (NIH).  Data  collection  was  only  fea-
sible  from  NSF,  NIH  and  USDA;  adequate  data  on  grant  applications  and  awards
were not available from DOD or DOE. According to the report:

‘‘[There  are]  numerous  limitations  in  the  information  collected  in  federal  agen-
cies’  grant  application  and  award  data  systems.  Such  limitations  hinder  the
ability  to  track  gender  differences  in  federal  grant  funding.  Better  tracking  of
gender differences in such funding would require that all agencies awarding sig-
nificant grant funding do the following:
• Maintain a data system that stores information on all grant applications and
investigators,  including  co-investigators.  Ideally,  each  agency  would  have  a
single data system rather than separate systems for each sub-agency or grant
program and the agencies would agree on a common list of key data elements.
• Include  in  the  application  form  key  personal  characteristics  for  each  investi-
gator,  including  gender,  race  and  ethnicity,  institution  (in  a  way  that  can  be
easily  categorized),  type  of  academic  appointment  for  investigators  in  post-
secondary education, discipline, degree, and year of degree.

• Fill  in  missing  personal  information,  including  gender,  where  possible  from

other applications by the same investigator.

• Record  the  amount  requested  and  awarded  for  each  proposal  and  any  score

assigned to it by the peer reviewers.

• Clearly  identify  initial  proposals  and  awards,  supplements  that  involve  new

funding, and amendments that involve no new funding.’’

Cost of Survey Implementation

Current,  simple  federal  surveys  conducted  by  SRS  cost  approximately  $800,000
annually to implement. The costs are incurred by a survey firm contracted to collect
and process the data. This expense does not include the cost of SRS staff, who pro-
vide oversight and administration of the survey efforts, or the costs of collection and
reporting incurred by each of the individual federal agencies.

If NSF were tasked to expand its data collection efforts to include the more com-
plex  project-specific  and  demographic  data  envisioned  in  the  proposed  legislation,
SRS  would  require  additional  funding,  or  we  would  have  to  reduce  other  ongoing
survey  efforts.  These  costs  do  not  include  the  additional  SRS  staff  time  and  re-
sources  that  would  be  required  to  facilitate  the  data  surveys,  nor  the  additional
costs  that  would  be  incurred  by  other  federal  agencies  in  setting  up  the  requisite
data systems and annually reporting the data to SRS.

Conclusion

Mr.  Chairman,  I  hope  that  I  have  been  able  to  articulate  NSF’s  unique  role  in
gathering  and  analyzing  data  about  the  Nation’s  S&E  enterprise.  I  hope  my  com-
ments  help  feed  the  discussion  about  how  to  collect  indicators  adequately  to  help
our nation measure our progress in ensuring that there is no gender bias in science
and technology.

In  summary,  however,  SRS  does  not  have  the  ability  to  require  funding  agencies
to maintain such records. If Congress seeks to require such a collection, the Grants
Policy  Committee,  which  is  charged  with  overseeing  government-wide  grants  policy
initiatives  and  making  policy  recommendations  to  the  Office  of  Management  and
Budget, might be able to provide additional insight.

SRS does welcome the opportunity, however, to continue to be involved in discus-
sions  on  this  important  draft  legislation,  as  we  are  constantly  striving  to  improve
our  contribution  to  the  policy  process.  NSF  looks  forward  to  collaborating  with  our
sister  agencies  and  the  broader  S&E  community  to  more  effectively  collect  and  re-
port on important data related to innovation and competitiveness. Thank you for the
opportunity to appear before you, and I am happy to answer any questions.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

16

BIOGRAPHY FOR LYNDA T. CARLSON

Since  2000,  Dr.  Lynda  Carlson  has  been  the  Director  of  the  National  Science
Foundation’s Division of Science Resources Statistics. In that role, she is responsible
for  all  activities  of  the  Division,  a  federal  statistical  agency  within  NSF.  Prior  to
coming  to  NSF,  Dr.  Carlson  was  at  the  Energy  Information  Administration  (EIA)
of  the  Department  of  Energy  where  she  held  a  variety  of  positions  over  23  years.
She is internationally known for the design and development of the Nation’s energy
consumption  surveys,  including  the  development  of  a  unique  statistical  sampling
frame of commercial buildings. Dr. Carlson’s last position at EIA was that of Direc-
tor  of  the  Statistical  Methods  Group  with  responsibility  for  all  statistical  activities
throughout EIA.

Dr.  Carlson  received  her  M.A.  and  Ph.D.  from  the  University  of  Illinois  at  Ur-
bana–Champaign  in  Political  Science  and  her  B.A.  from  Brooklyn  College,  CUNY.
She  is  a  Fellow  of  the  American  Statistical  Association  and  member  of  various
groups such as AAPOR and AAAS. She has served on a series of OMB committees,
is  a  member  of  the  Federal  Committee  on  Statistical  Methodology,  and  has  served
on  several  NAS  committees.  In  2000,  she  received  the  highest  departmental  award
from the Department of Energy for her service to that agency.

Dr.  Carlson  has  written  on  energy  consumption,  survey  methodology,  and  the

science and engineering enterprise.

Chairman BAIRD. Thank you, Dr. Carlson. Dr. Blevins?

STATEMENT  OF  DR.  LINDA  G.  BLEVINS,  SENIOR  TECHNICAL
ADVISOR, OFFICE OF THE DEPUTY DIRECTOR FOR SCIENCE
PROGRAMS, U.S. DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY
Dr.  BLEVINS.  Chairman  Baird,  Ranking  Member  Ehlers,  and
Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to
testify  today.  I  would  like  to  provide  you  with  some  information
about two gender equity workshops.

In  January  of  2006,  the  academic  chemistry  community  pio-
neered  a  format  for  a  gender  equity  workshop.  The  workshop  got
its  start  because  the  chemistry  community  observed  that  50  per-
cent  of  their  bachelor’s  degrees  went  to  women,  and  35  percent  of
their  Ph.D.s  went  to  women,  but  only  13  percent  of  the  faculty
members  in  the  top  50  university  chemistry  departments  were
women. Top 50 refers to departments that receive the most federal
research  dollars.  The  workshop  thus  targeted  the  participation  of
the chairs from these departments.

Around  the  time  of  the  chemistry  workshop,  two  National  Acad-
emies reports were released, Rising Above the Gathering Storm and
Beyond  Bias  and  Barriers.  These  two  reports  reinforced  the  DOE
Office of Science’s motivation to be involved in gender equity work-
shops.

In May of 2007, the physics community hosted a workshop of its
own  based  on  the  chemistry  model  but  adding  some  different  fea-
tures. Each of these workshops, while organized by the relevant re-
search community, has involved the major funding agencies for the
given scientific field. For example, the chemistry workshop was co-
funded and advised by DOE, NSF, and NIH. The physics workshop
involved DOE and NSF.

I would like to highlight a few important points about the work-
shops.  First,  the  workshops  are  community-driven.  The  steering
committees  are  made  of  distinguished  research  scientists  within
the discipline, and the workshops are designed to create a sense of
ownership  of  the  outcomes  within  each  scientific  community.  In-
volvement  of  high-level  federal  officials  from  the  relevant  funding
program seems significant in reinforcing the importance of the top-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

17

ical  matter.  The  workshop  concept  uses  demographic  data  and  so-
cial  science  to  examine  the  underlying  causes  of  gender  gaps  in
science.  Data-driven  science  is  emphasized  over  anecdotes,  and  so-
cial  science  is  presented  objectively.  Planning  such  a  workshop  in-
volves an enormous amount of work.

Each  community  has  a  unique  demographic  and  a  unique  cul-
ture, which means each workshop may have different features. For
example,  because  women  are  under-represented  at  all  levels  in
physics,  that  workshop  had  a  session  on  education  issues  that  did
not appear in the chemistry workshop.

Each  workshop  brings  an  experienced  and  influential  group  to-
gether  to  tackle  tough  issues.  Attendance  is  limited  to  about  100
people,  and  participants  include  department  chairs,  speakers  that
include social scientists, federal officials, and opinion leaders.

For  physics,  managers  from  13  DOE  national  laboratories  were
invited  along  with  the  top  50  chairs.  Workshops  include  lectures,
panel  discussions,  and  break-out  sessions.  Interactive  theater  and
implicit  bias  demonstrations  can  shift  perspectives  and  encourage
community action. Action items are developed in the break-out ses-
sions,  and  participants  are  asked  to  select  and  commit  to  carrying
them  out.  Tools  such  as  interactive  websites  allow  the  organizers
from the communities to track progress over time.

The metrics for success proposed and used so far by the commu-
nities have been attitude changes as measured using approved pre-
and  post-workshop  surveys  and  tracking  of  the  documented  com-
mitment  by  the  participants  to  implement  action  items  and  their
regular  follow-up  progress  reports.  For  the  chemistry  workshop,
these metrics are already demonstrating early success.

The  workshops  have  not  revealed  differences  between  federally
funded  research  and  development  centers  and  universities  and
their  potential  for  implicit  bias.  There  are  some  other  differences,
though.  First,  FFRDCs  do  not  always  have  discreet  disciplinary
units  like  academic  departments.  Second,  while  universities  have
tenure,  FFRDCs  have  various  promotion  systems,  and  these  dif-
ferences create challenges for designing common workshops.

So  development  of  this  workshop  series  is  being  driven  by  the
scientific  communities  and  has  demonstrated  some  initial  success.
The  model  for  these  workshops  continues  to  evolve.  The  agencies
funding  and  advising  these  workshops  have  forged  good  working
relationship  with  each  other  and  with  the  communities  working  to
achieve gender equity. And the innovative nature of each workshop
and of the workshop concept has drawn, and continues to maintain,
DOE’s interest in participating.

Thank you again, Mr. Chairman, for the opportunity to speak be-

fore you today, and I would be happy to answer questions.

[The prepared statement of Dr. Blevins follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF LINDA G. BLEVINS

Chairman  Baird,  Ranking  Member  Ehlers,  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,
thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  today.  I  would  like  to  provide  you  with  the
history  of  the  DOE  Office  of  Science’s  involvement  in  several  gender  equity  work-
shops.

The 2005 demographics of academic chemistry departments as reported by Chem-
ical and Engineering News told a striking story that motivated the design of a new
workshop  series.  First,  an  impressive  50  percent  of  chemistry  Bachelor’s  degrees

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

18

were awarded to women and 35 percent of chemistry Ph.D. degrees went to women.1
Despite these strong training numbers, only 13 percent of the faculty from the ‘‘top
50’’  university  chemistry  departments  in  the  U.S.  were  women.2 This  disparity  be-
tween  the  fraction  of  women  obtaining  Ph.D.  degrees  and  the  fraction  of  women
serving  as  university  faculty  led  the  chemistry  community  to  develop  a  workshop
concept  that  targeted  the  participation  of  the  chairs  of  the  top  50  university  chem-
istry departments. Workshop organizers engaged the major federal funders of chem-
istry  research—the  Department  of  Energy  (DOE),  the  National  Science  Foundation
(NSF), and the National Institutes of Health (NIH)—for financial support and work-
shop  involvement.  A  steering  committee,  whose  members  were  well-recognized  aca-
demic  chemists  respected  for  their  research  contributions,  was  established.  The
workshop  used  demographic  data  and  social  science  to  examine  the  underlying
causes of the gender gap in university chemistry departments.

Around the time of the chemistry workshop, the National Academies report, ‘‘Ris-
ing  Above  the  Gathering  Storm:  Energizing  and  Employing  America  for  a  Brighter
Economic Future,’’ focused broad public attention on issues relating to the future of
the physical sciences workforce in the United States. Soon after, another Academies
report,  ‘‘Beyond  Bias  and  Barriers:  Fulfilling  the  Potential  of  Women  in  Academic
Science  and  Engineering,’’  helped  raise  awareness  that  unintentional  biases  can
limit women’s participation in science. These two reports reinforced the DOE Office
of Science’s motivation to support gender equity workshops.

The  chemistry  workshop,  ‘‘Building  Strong  Academic  Chemistry  Departments
through  Gender  Equity,’’ 3 was  held  January  29–31,  2006,  and  included  lectures,
panel  discussions,  and  breakout  sessions.  Academic  leaders,  social  scientists,  and
funding agency senior managers discussed demographic data and social science find-
ings  and  used  the  breakout  sessions  to  apply  their  broad,  collective  experience  to
identify  action  items  for  further  work.  A  thought-provoking  interactive  theater  skit
on  the  first  night  demonstrated  potential  for  implicit  bias  in  academic  mentoring,
with  actors  staying  in  character  to  address  audience  questions.  The  social  science
presentations argued that most men and women exhibit unintended or implicit bias
and that gender schemas4—hidden assumptions about a person’s behavior based on
gender—can slow women’s advancement in academia and other career paths. At the
conclusion  of  the  workshop,  the  chairs  committed  to  carry  out  at  least  two  action
items apiece from lists developed in the workshop breakout sessions.

A report describing the chemistry workshop and resultant action items for univer-
sity  and  college  departments,  institutions,  and  funding  agencies  was  released  in
2006.  Action  items  dealt  with  issues  such  as  educating  others  about  implicit  bias
and  developing  policies  that  facilitate  hiring  of  women,  including  spousal  hiring.
Forty-five of the 56 chairs who attended the workshop visited an interactive website
and  selected  action  items  to  implement.  Results  of  pre-  and  post-workshop  attitu-
dinal surveys administered by the Committee on the Advancement of Women Chem-
ists  (COACh) 5 showed  measurable  changes  in  the  chairs’  views.  The  interactive
website  was  developed  by  COACh  to  track  progress  in  the  chairs’  implementation
of action items. At the end of the first and second years after the workshop, COACh
received  progress  updates  from  chairs.  Twenty-five  chairs  have  followed  up  with
COACh  to  report  progress  this  year.  The  high  participation  rate  in  selecting  action
items and following up with progress reports has been encouraging.

The chemistry workshop resulted in shifts in attitude among the university chem-
istry department chairs who participated. These shifts were measured using an ap-
proved  survey  instrument  developed  by  COACh  and  the  steering  committee.  Before
the workshop, the chairs generally felt that the principal factors limiting their abil-
ity  to  hire  women  were  beyond  their  administrative  control-factors  such  as  too  few
applicants, candidate loss to other departments, and lack of spousal employment op-
portunities. After the workshop, however, chairs were more likely to report the lim-
iting factors were those they could affect, such as low faculty commitment to hiring
women and lack of financing. Additionally, chairs’ perceptions of the factors slowing
the  progress  of  women  chemistry  faculty  changed.  A  paper  reporting  these  results
will appear in the archival literature.6

1 C&E  News  Vol.  83  No.  44,  pp.  38–39,  31  October  2005;  also  Vol.  84  No.  30,  pp.  43–52,  July

2 ‘‘Top 50’’ is defined by federal research expenditures. C&E News Vol. 83 pp. 38–39, 31 Octo-

2006.

ber 2005.

3 http://www.chem.harvard.edu/groups/friend/GenderEquityWorkshop/index.html
4 Valian,  V.  (1998).  Why  so  slow?  The  advancement  of  women.  Cambridge,  MA:  M.I.T.  Press.
5 http://coach.uoregon.edu/
6 ‘‘Promoting Gender Equity in Academic Departments: A Study of Department Heads in Top-
Ranked Chemistry Departments,’’ J. Greene, P. Lewis, G.L. Richmond, and J. Stockard, Journal
of Women and Minorities in Science and Engineering, In Press (2008).

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

19

Inspired by the first workshop and follow-up within the chemistry community, the
physics community approached the major funders of physics research—the DOE Of-
fice of Science and the NSF Mathematical and Physical Sciences Directorate—about
hosting  a  similar  workshop  in  their  field.  Workshop  proposals  were  submitted  and
successfully  reviewed  at  both  agencies.  A  respected  physics  workshop  steering  com-
mittee  was  formed,  and  the  time-intensive  planning  process  began.  The  American
Physical  Society’s  Committee  on  the  Status  of  Women  in  Physics7 (APS  CSWP)
spearheaded  the  planning  effort  with  advice  from  the  funding  agencies.  The  work-
shop,  ‘‘Strengthening  the  Physics  Enterprise  in  Universities  and  National  Labora-
tories,’’ 8 was held May 6–8, 2007.

It  was  clear  from  the  beginning  that  physics  demographics  were  very  different
from those of chemistry: In 2005, only 21 percent of Bachelor’s degrees and 14 per-
cent  of  Ph.D.  degrees  in  physics  were  awarded  to  women,9 while  2002  data  showed
that  only  about  seven  percent  of  faculty  members  in  the  Nation’s  top  50  university
physics  departments  were  women.10 Thus,  in  contrast  to  chemistry,  women  were
under-represented in the science of physics at every level. Most of the physics work-
shop design was similar to that of the chemistry workshop, but a session on under-
graduate and graduate education was added to address the demographic imbalance.
Managers  from  DOE  national  laboratories  were  involved  because  of  the  importance
of  physicists  to  the  missions  of  the  national  laboratories.  Results  from  the  pre-  and
post-workshop  surveys  are  currently  being  analyzed,  and  implementation  of  action
items  is  being  tracked  by  the  APS  CSWP.  A  report  from  the  physics  gender  equity
workshop is in the final stages of preparation.

Inspired  by  the  gender  equity  workshops,  the  chemistry  community  organized  a
department chair workshop addressing racial and ethnic equity, held September 24–
26,  2007  with  sponsorship  from  DOE,  NSF,  and  NIH.  The  materials  sciences  and
engineering  community  is  currently  planning  a  gender  equity  workshop  of  its  own,
with anticipated co-funding from DOE and NSF, to be held May 18–20, 2008.

The remainder of my testimony will focus on the questions proposed in the invita-

tion letter for this hearing.
1. Based  on  your  own  experience  in  helping  to  organize  workshops  to  ad-
dress gender bias in the chemistry and physics communities in 2006 and
2007, what are the elements of an effective workshop? In answering this
question, please address workshop content, format, speakers, and partic-
ipant  categories,  in  addition  to  any  other  elements  that  are  important
to an effective workshop.
To  provide  a  little  background,  I  personally  attended  the  2006  chemistry  gender
equity  workshop  and  was  a  federal  advisor  to  the  steering  committees  for  the  2007
physics  gender  equity  workshop  and  the  2007  chemistry  racial  and  ethnic  equity
workshop.  A  few  observations  can  be  made  about  the  workshop  series  as  a  whole.
Each workshop requires months of hard preparation work by the relevant scientific
communities  before  the  meeting  occurs.  A  distinguished  steering  committee,  com-
prised of five to ten highly respected researchers, encourages university department
chairs  to  attend  a  given  workshop  and  participate  fully.  At  least  one  steering  com-
mittee member should be expert in the social sciences addressing women in science
to  provide  insight  and  planning  advice  from  that  perspective.  The  workshops  have
been  structured  by  the  communities  and,  as  a  result,  the  communities  accept  a
strong sense of ownership of the outcomes. Follow-up activities that include reports
of  progress  on  action  items  are  as  important  as  the  workshop  itself,  as  they  main-
tain attention on the action items.

Workshop attendance is by invitation and is typically limited to about 100 people
to facilitate information exchange. Participant travel expenses are supported by fed-
eral  agencies  so  that  cost  is  not  an  impediment  to  participation.  The  chairs  are  se-
lected  from  departments  that  produce  the  most  Ph.D.s  and/or  receive  the  most  fed-
eral  research  dollars.  Such  chairs  are  typically  role  models  and  have  the  ability  to
influence their own faculty as well as other department chairs. Bringing such a peer
group together encourages mutual cooperation toward common goals. Steering com-
mittee members sometimes engage funding agency officials in encouraging chairs to
attend.  When  a  chair  is  unavailable,  special  effort  is  made  to  have  him/her  nomi-
nate  an  influential  colleague  with  demonstrated  departmental  leadership.  Each

7 http://www.aps.org/programs/women/
8 http://www.aps.org/programs/women/workshops/gender-equity/index.cfm
9 http://www.aip.org/statistics/
10 ‘‘A National Analysis of Diversity in Science and Engineering Faculties at Research Univer-
sities,’’  Dr.  Donna  J.  Nelson,  Norman,  OK.  January,  2005.  http://cheminfo.chem.ou.edu/?djn/
diversity/briefings/Diversity%20Report%20Final.pdf

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

20

workshop  audience  includes  a  few  opinion  leaders,  defined  as  either  distinguished
disciplinary  scientists  with  sway  over  their  colleagues  or  other  scientists  with
unique  expertise  relevant  to  equity  for  under-represented  groups  in  science.  These
opinion leaders are carefully chosen by the steering committee for their potential to
stimulate discourse throughout the workshop. The presence of high level federal offi-
cials from the relevant disciplinary funding programs seems important, as they rein-
force  the  importance  of  gender  equity  among  the  science  community  participants.
For workshop content, data-driven science is emphasized over anecdotal evidence.
Social  science  is  presented  objectively  and  dispassionately.  Breakout  sessions  have
ranged  from  unstructured  discussions  of  generic  questions  to  structured  scenario
analyses.  Inviting  a  science  writer  to  help  produce  a  workshop  is  also  a  good  idea.
Creative  touches  such  as  interactive  theater  and  implicit  bias  demonstrations  can
shift  perspectives  and  create  group  experiences  that  encourage  community  action.
2. What metrics should be used to evaluate the success of such workshops
in changing individual behavior and institutional culture related to gen-
der equity in academic science and engineering?
The  success  metrics  proposed  and  used  by  the  communities  have  been  (1)  attitu-
dinal  change  as  measured  using  pre-  and  post-workshop  surveys  and  (2)  tracking
of  the  documented  commitment  by  participants  to  implement  action  items  and  to
provide  follow-up  via  interactive  websites.  Efforts  have  been  made  to  keep  the  pre-
and  post-workshop  surveys  similar  so  results  for  different  community  cultures  and
workshop  features  can  be  compared.  Involvement  of  COACh  with  survey  instru-
ments  has  helped  maintain  continuity.  Survey  results  are  still  being  analyzed  from
workshops  held  after  the  chemistry  gender  workshop.  The  chemistry  department
chairs  who  reported  back  to  COACh  two  years  after  that  workshop  have  described
implementation  of  a  number  of  new  policies  to  encourage  gender  equity,  including
reduced  teaching  load  after  childbirth,  stopping  the  tenure  clock,  mandatory  men-
toring plans for junior faculty, more inclusive appointment procedures for influential
committees, changes in interview methods to better assure fairness, and scheduling
of faculty meetings during business hours. Communities planning future workshops
may consider developing other metrics that could be evaluated by the funding agen-
cies as part of proposal merit review.

A recurring theme from these workshops and other stakeholder input is the need
to  collect  and  track  demographic  data.  Increased  percentages  of  women  could  indi-
cate  that  positive  changes  are  taking  place.  Some  science  communities,  like  chem-
istry and physics, have ready access to data from professional societies. Others, like
the materials sciences and engineering community, need to develop sources for such
data.
3. Are  there  challenges  in  overcoming  gender  bias  that  are  unique  to  the
National Laboratories? Should the workshops have sessions that are tai-
lored specifically to National Laboratory participants?
The workshops have not revealed differences in the potential for implicit bias be-
tween Federally Funded Research and Development Centers (FFRDCs) and univer-
sities.  Social  science  research  and  understanding  suggest  that  implicit  bias  would
exist  in  many  technical  environments,  which  might  include  universities,  national
laboratories,  and  other  FFRDCs.  Thus,  approaches  to  identify  and  raise  awareness
of implicit bias could be similar in any of them.

The  physics  gender  equity  workshop  did,  however,  highlight  some  organizational
differences  between  FFRDCs  and  universities  that  create  workshop  planning  chal-
lenges. First, FFRDCs do not necessarily have discrete disciplinary units as do aca-
demic departments. FFRDC managers lead groups, divisions, directorates, branches,
centers,  etc.,  with  various  disciplines  represented  among  tens  to  hundreds  of  sci-
entists. The development of surveys that would apply to both university and FFRDC
structures as well as the selection of chair rank- and scope-equivalent FFRDC man-
agers have proven to be challenging in organizing workshops and devising data col-
lection  tools.  A  single  FFRDC  manager  with  full  responsibility  and  authority  to
identify  problems  and  implement  changes  for  a  scientific  discipline  may  not  exist.
Second, universities typically have tenure systems, while FFRDCs can have various
promotion  systems.  Some  FFRDCs  have  versions  of  tenure;  some  operate  more  like
corporations. No one model applies to all.

To  date,  workshop  information  has  emphasized  academic  practice;  it  must  be
adapted to be relevant to FFRDCs. Structuring some workshop sessions specifically
for  FFRDCs  is  a  good  suggestion  that  may  provide  more  information  more  useful
for them.

Despite their organizational differences, laboratories have been influenced by find-
ings from the gender equity workshops. For example, Brookhaven National Labora-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

21

tory  undertook  an  activity 
inspired  by  the  two  gender  equity  workshops.
Brookhaven had sent a representative to the 2006 chemistry workshop and another
to  the  2007  physics  workshop.  These  individuals  returned  to  the  laboratory  with
specific  ideas  about  steps  that  could  be  taken  toward  improving  gender  equity  and,
after  discussion,  laboratory  management  decided  to  form  a  new  team.  The  Family
Friendly Committee, a group of 15 laboratory employees from various job levels, was
commissioned  by  the  laboratory  director  and  met  nine  times  during  its  first  year.
The  Family  Friendly  Committee,  in  turn,  formed  subcommittees  to  consider  such
topics  as  alternate  work  schedules,  leave  policies,  and  family  services.  The  sub-
committees  examined  current  practices  at  Brookhaven  and  developed  some  15  sug-
gestions  for  improvement.  These  recommendations  are  currently  being  assembled
into  an  internal  report  to  laboratory  management.  The  Family  Friendly  Committee
also hosted two distinguished gender equity experts for day-long visits to the labora-
tory. Each of their seminars attracted about 100 people.

The  workshop  series  continues  to  be  driven  by  the  scientific  communities,  which
have  been  encouraged  by  the  demonstrated  success  of  their  initial  efforts.  Each
science  discipline  has  a  unique  culture  and  demographic.  These  differences  neces-
sitate  somewhat  different  features  for  each  workshop.  The  model  for  these  work-
shops continues to evolve, and communities wanting to organize such workshops for
themselves  continue  to  propose  innovative  ideas  for  consideration  by  appropriate
funding  agencies.  The  agencies  funding  and  advising  these  workshops  have  forged
good  working  relationships  with  each  other  and  with  the  communities  working  to
achieve  gender  equity.  The  innovative  nature  of  the  workshop  concept  has  drawn
and maintains DOE’s interest in participating.

That  concludes  my  testimony,  Mr.  Chairman.  Thank  you,  again,  for  the  oppor-
tunity  to  speak  before  you  today.  I  would  be  happy  to  answer  any  questions  the
Committee may have.

BIOGRAPHY FOR LINDA G. BLEVINS

Dr.  Linda  G.  Blevins  is  a  Senior  Technical  Advisor  in  the  Office  of  the  Deputy
Director  for  Science  Programs  in  the  Department  of  Energy’s  (DOE)  Office  of
Science. She joined the staff of the Deputy Director for Science Programs in Novem-
ber  2007  to  provide  technical  advice  on  many  aspects  of  science  program  manage-
ment.  From  April  2006  through  November  2007  she  served  as  Technical  and  Inter-
national  Advisor  in  the  DOE  Office  of  Basic  Energy  Sciences.  From  July  2004
through  March  2006,  she  was  the  National  Science  Foundation  (NSF)  Program  Di-
rector  for  Combustion  and  Plasma  Systems  while  on  a  leave  of  absence  from  the
DOE  Combustion  Research  Facility  at  Sandia  National  Laboratories  (SNL),  where
she began working in 2000. From 1996–2000, Dr. Blevins was on the research staff
of  the  National  Institute  of  Standards  and  Technology  (NIST)  in  the  Building  and
Fire  Research  Laboratory.  She  received  a  Ph.D.  from  Purdue  University  in  1996,  a
M.S. from Virginia Tech in 1992, and a B.S. summa cum laude from the University
of Alabama in 1989. All of her degrees are in mechanical engineering.

Dr. Blevins has served on the Executive Board of the California Biomass Collabo-
rative,  the  Executive  Committee  of  the  Western  States  Section  of  the  Combustion
Institute, the University of Alabama (UA) College of Engineering Leadership Board,
and  the  UA  Mechanical  Engineering  Advisory  Board.  She  is  a  University  of  Ala-
bama  Department  of  Mechanical  Engineering  Distinguished  Fellow.  Dr.  Blevins  is
also a member of the American Society for Engineering Education, the American So-
ciety  of  Mechanical  Engineers,  the  Combustion  Institute,  the  American  Institute  of
Astronautics and Aeronautics, Pi Tau Sigma, Tau Beta Pi, and the Women’s Council
on Energy and Environment. She was a contributor to the book, Giving Much/Gain-
ing More: Mentoring for Success, written by Emily M. Wadsworth and published by
Purdue University Press in 2002. At Purdue, she was a NSF Fellow, a Clare Boothe
Luce Fellow, and a Link Foundation Energy Fellow.

Her  areas  of  research  expertise  are  soot  formation,  instrumentation  for  probing
high  temperature  gas/particle  mixtures,  gaseous  pollutant  and  particulate  forma-
tion,  and  combustion  of  natural  gas,  coal,  and  biomass.  Her  research  at  NIST  and
SNL  was  funded  by  the  National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administration,  the  Stra-
tegic  Environmental  Research  and  Development  Program,  the  DOE,  the  Air  Force
Research Laboratory, and the NIST Advanced Technology Program intramural pro-
gram.  She  is  author  or  co-author  of  22  archival  journal  articles  and  more  than  75
reports and conference papers.

Dr.  Blevins  currently  serves  on  the  Research  Business  Models  Subcommittee  of
the National Science and Technology Council’s Committee on Science. As part of her
role  in  the  Office  of  Science,  she  serves  as  the  program  manager  for  cross-cutting
efforts  such  as  the  National  Academies’  America’s  Energy  Future  project.  Dr.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

22

Blevins  also  advises  the  Deputy  Director  for  Science  Programs  on  Office  of  Science
policies related to the management of science programs and research portfolio inte-
gration  across  the  program  offices  within  the  Office  of  Science  and  DOE  and  with
other federal agencies.

Chairman  BAIRD.  You  folks  are  amazing.  We  had  four  seconds
left  on  your  time  clock.  This  is  unprecedented.  Let  us  see  if  Dr.
Ginther  can  hit  the  mark  as  well.  Dr.  Ginther,  thank  you  very
much.

STATEMENT  OF  DR.  DONNA  K.  GINTHER,  ASSOCIATE  PRO-
FESSOR, DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMICS; DIRECTOR, CENTER
FOR  ECONOMIC  AND  BUSINESS  ANALYSIS,  UNIVERSITY  OF
KANSAS
Dr. GINTHER. Chairman Baird, Ranking Member Ehlers and dis-
tinguished Members of the Subcommittee, thank you for the oppor-
tunity  to  testify  today  on  the  pending  legislation.  I  am  an  econo-
mist  specializing  in  research  on  academic  labor  markets.  My  NSF-
funded  research  examines  the  question,  does  science  discriminate
against women?

My research shows that women who have children are less likely
to enter academic science careers. Thus, the single most important
step that Congress can take to help women is to allow universities
to count childcare facilities toward indirect costs in order to expand
the availability of childcare for academic caregivers.

I have been asked to comment on data availability related to gen-
der  disparities  and  specific  proposals  of  the  Act.  I  comment  on
these now.

In terms of data, I used the NSF’s survey of doctorate recipients
in my research. This is an excellent data source. However, with all
data,  there  are  some  limitations.  I  find  that  there  are  no  gender
gaps  in  the  promotion  of  scientists  who  tenure  or  full  professor.  I
find,  however,  gender  gaps  in  the  promotion  of  social  scientists,
specially in my own discipline of economics, and I find gender gaps
in salary at the full professor level.

However,  I  cannot  attribute  all  of  these  gender  gaps  to  bias  be-
cause there are key factors missing in the data that might explain
the  gender  gap.  The  first  is  productivity.  There  is  no  availability
of  annual  publications,  citations,  and  annual  patents.  Second  will
be  dual  career  concerns.  We  don’t  have  information  on  spouses’
education, employment, and earnings. Finally, it would be useful to
have information on caregiving, time women spend in childcare and
house time work.

Now,  I  turn  to  specific  aspects  of  the  proposal.  In  terms  of  the
workshops  on  gender  bias,  the  goal  is  that  information  about  im-
plicit  bias  will  lead  to  changes  in  behavior.  First,  when  imple-
menting  these  workshops,  a  valid  research  design  is  essential.
Treatment  and  control  groups  should  evaluate  the  same  proposal,
and  then  any  difference  in  evaluation  can  be  judged  as  a  result  of
these workshops on bias. We need to evaluate the workshops based
on outcomes.

Second, it is important to provide training for the principal inves-
tigators  who  supervise  post-docs  because  this  is  where  the  system
seems to break down for women.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

23

Third,  I  recommend  that  we  expand  these  workshops  to  include
mentoring  activities  for  both  post-docs  and  junior  faculty.  Men-
toring for junior faculty complements mentoring for evaluators and
treats both sides of the problem.

Second,  the  Act  calls  for  extending  grant  support  for  caregiving.
Both  the  NSF  and  NIH  provide  for  no-cost  extensions  of  grant
monies,  and  these  practices  should  be  implemented  across  federal
funding agencies.

Finally, I have been asked to comment on the federal role in gen-
der equity. First and foremost, the Federal Government should pro-
vide  grant  support  to  caregivers  through  direct  and  indirect  costs.
We  should  count  daycare  facilities  toward  indirect  costs,  therefore
subsidizing  access  to  daycare  on  campus,  and  federal  guidelines
should  be  modified  to  allow  charging  grants  for  childcare  during
conferences and for travel for small children to conferences.

Second,  we  need  to  provide  financial  support  for  improved  data
collection  and  research  analysis  in  order  to  understand  the  gender
disparities and point to solutions to these problems.

Third,  we  need  to  evaluate  gender  intervention  programs  based
on  outcomes  and  disseminate  best  practices.  ADVANCE  can  pro-
vide a model for other federal agencies.

Mr. Chairman, once again, I thank you for the opportunity to tes-
tify today. The under-representation of women in academic science
results from more than implicit or explicit bias. Although bias may
play  a  role,  my  research  suggests  that  the  difficulties  women  face
in  balancing  work  and  family  in  the  post-doctoral  years  cause  too
many women to leave science. Immediate childcare support on cam-
pus  for  graduate  students,  post-doctoral  students  and  faculty,  bet-
ter  data,  and  greater  access  to  that  data  and  rigorous  evaluations
of interventions will allow for a more complete picture of the prob-
lem and point to necessary solutions. I will be happy to answer any
questions about my testimony.

[The prepared statement of Dr. Ginther follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DONNA K. GINTHER

Introduction

Chairman Baird, Ranking Member Ehlers and distinguished Members of the Sub-
committee,  thank  you  for  the  invitation  to  testify  today.  It  is  an  honor  for  me  to
comment  on  specific  provisions  in  the  legislation  pending  before  the  Subcommittee.
My  research,  professional,  and  university  service  has  centered  on  understanding
the issues related to the advancement of women in science and social science careers
and engaging in institutional transformation efforts to affect change for women aca-
demics.  I  have  published  eight  articles  and  written  six  additional  working  papers
on  the  topic  of  gender  differences  in  employment  outcomes  in  academia.1 In  2003
I  received  a  National  Science  Foundation  grant  to  investigate  ‘‘Gender  Differences
in  Employment  Outcomes  for  Academics  in  Science  and  Social  Science’’  SES–
0353703, which has provided financial support for this research agenda. In addition,
I  have  served  as  a  co-Principle  Investigator  for  two  NSF  ADVANCE  Institutional
Transformation  grant  proposals  submitted  by  the  University  of  Kansas.  I  serve  on
the  Board  of  Directors  of  the  Committee  of  the  Status  of  Women  in  the  Economics
Profession  of  the  American  Economics  Association  where  my  main  duty  is  to  run
national  mentoring  workshops  for  junior  faculty.  Finally,  I  am  currently  the  Chair
of  the  Faculty  Compensation  Committee  at  the  University  of  Kansas  where  I  have
worked to create and implement tenure stop-clock and modified instructional duties
policies  for  faculty  engaged  in  family  caregiving  responsibilities.  In  these  many  ca-

1 These publications and working papers are listed in the references.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

24

pacities,  I  feel  qualified  to  comment  on  Fulfilling  the  Potential  of  Women  in  Aca-
demic Science and Engineering Act of 2008.

My  research  shows  that  women  who  have  children  are  less  likely  to  enter  aca-
demic  science  careers.  The  single  most  important  step  Congress  can  take  to  fulfill
the  potential  of  women  in  academic  science  is  to  allow  universities  the  opportunity
to  count  child  care  facilities  toward  indirect  costs  in  order  to  expand  availability  of
childcare for academic caregivers.

Summary of Research Results

Many  studies,  most  recently  the  National  Academies  Report,  Beyond  Bias  and
Barriers,  have  documented  gender  differences  in  hiring,  salary,  and  promotion.
However,  interpreting  the  causes  of  gender  disparities  in  employment  outcomes  re-
quires an in-depth examination of the data.

Economic  theory  provides  the  underpinnings  of  my  research  on  these  issues.
Economists start by assuming that employment outcomes are determined by market
forces. Wages and hiring are determined by the supply of and demand for Ph.D. sci-
entists. Equally productive workers, regardless of gender, will be paid the same and
hired in similar numbers given market forces. Given these assumptions, one should
not observe hiring, promotion, and salary differences by gender. However, persistent
gender  wage  and  employment  differentials  persist  on  average  in  the  market  as  a
whole  (Altonji  and  Blank,  1999)  and  for  scientists  in  particular  (Ginther,  2001
2006).

Beginning  with  Becker’s  seminal  work  on  discrimination  (Becker,  1971),  econo-
mists have developed models to understand gender and racial disparities in employ-
ment  outcomes.  Becker  argues  that  taste-based  discrimination  (prejudice)  will  be
eliminated  by  competitive  forces.  As  a  result,  bias  and  prejudice  are  ruled  out  as
explanations of the gender gap unless all other possible explanations posited by eco-
nomic  theory  have  been  disproved.  One  alternative  to  discrimination,  individual
‘‘preferences’’ or choices, are most-often used to examine the gender gap. Preference-
based  explanations  argue  that  gender  differences  in  employment  outcomes  result
from choices, in particular differences in productivity. Since theory holds that equal-
ly  productive  workers  are  paid  or  promoted  the  same,  it  follows  that  gender  dif-
ferences in employment outcomes are the result of differences in productivity. A sec-
ond preference-based explanation is that women choose to marry and have children,
which in turn affects their attachment to their careers and overall productivity.

If  the  researcher  cannot  explain  the  gender  differences  in  employment  outcomes
using  one  of  the  above  explanations,  then  the  residual  gender  difference  in  hiring,
promotion, or salary may be attributed to discrimination. However, economists con-
tinue  to  search  for  rational  explanations—ones  that  will  not  be  eliminated  by  com-
petitive forces. Statistical discrimination suggests that imperfect information on the
part  of  employers  generates  wage  differentials.  In  this  model,  an  employer  at-
tributes  the  average  characteristics  of  a  group  to  an  individual  member  of  this
group—essentially, the employer uses a stereotype in making hiring decisions or set-
ting  wages.  As  a  result,  we  observe  gender  differences  in  employment  outcomes.
However, direct measures of statistical discrimination are difficult to come by. Thus,
discrimination  may  be  inferred  when  other  plausible  explanations  have  been  ruled
out.

Given these principles, my research poses the question: Does Science Discriminate
Against  Women?  I  have  evaluated  gender  differences  in  hiring,  promotion,  and  sal-
ary.  I  find  that  gender  differences  in  hiring  are  largely  explained  by  the  presence
of children—mothers are less likely to obtain tenure-track jobs in science and social
science (Ginther and Kahn forthcoming, 2006). Once women are on the tenure track,
we  find  no  significant  gender  differences  in  promotion  to  tenure  or  full  professor  in
the sciences (Ginther and Kahn forthcoming). However, women are much less likely
to  get  tenure  or  be  promoted  to  full  professor  in  the  social  sciences,  especially  in
economics (Ginther and Kahn 2004, 2006). Finally, I find that female full professors
in  the  sciences  earn  significantly  less  than  men  and  the  gap  is  not  fully  explained
by observable characteristics (Ginther 2001, 2003, 2004, 2006c).

Although I document substantial gender gaps in promotion and salaries, I cannot
rule out the fact that productivity differences explain the salary gap in science and
the  promotion  gap  in  social  science.  Also,  the  results  in  Ginther  and  Kahn  (forth-
coming)  suggest  that  factors  related  to  marriage  and  children  during  the
postdoctoral  period  reduce  the  number  of  women  in  tenure  track  academic  science.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

25

Until we have better data, as an economist, I am not in a position to conclude that
bias is the sole determinant of the gender gap in science.2

Data Needed to Understand Gender Disparities

My  research  on  gender  differences  in  employment  outcomes  has  used  the  Survey
of  Doctorate  Recipients  collected  by  the  NSF.  The  SDR  is  the  best  data  available
for  studying  career  outcomes  of  science  doctorates.  Like  all  data,  the  SDR  is  not
without  limitations.  Namely,  the  SDR  lacks  information  on  academic  productivity,
publications  and  citations  that  would  allow  researchers  to  determine  whether  pro-
ductivity  instead  of  bias  is  the  underlying  cause  of  the  gender  gap  in  salary  and
promotion.

Although the SDR has collected information on publications and patents, the data
are  not  available  in  every  year  of  the  survey  and  therefore  cannot  help  us  under-
stand  the  point  in  a  person’s  career  where  things  turn  around.  Further,  the  SDR
does  not  contain  information  on  the  quality  of  publications  measured  by  citations.
First and foremost, we need information on academic productivity measured by pub-
lications,  citations,  and  journal  impact  in  order  to  discern  whether  productivity  dif-
ferences  explain  the  gender  gap.  Second,  information  on  the  size  and  duration  of
federal grants would provide another indication of scientific productivity. One could
then  examine  the  correlation  between  grant  funding,  publications,  and  citations  to
create a measure of the return on the federal investment in science. Finally, patent
applications  and  patents  granted  from  the  U.S.  Patent  and  Trademark  Office  could
be included in the data set.

In 2003, I submitted ‘‘Gender Differences in Employment Outcomes for Academics
in  Science  and  Social  Science’’  SES–0353703  to  the  NSF.  This  grant  proposed  to
merge  publication  data  from  Thomson–ISI’s  Web  of  Science  onto  the  SDR.  I  sub-
mitted this grant because reviews of the previous proposal indicated that SDR data
without productivity measures was insufficient to answer the research question that
I had posed. My grant was funded in 2004, and the creation of the SDR Productivity
Database has been a work in progress ever since.

Essentially, a proposal to merge SDR data with other data sources puts legitimate
research  of  importance  to  Congress  at  odds  with  the  Confidential  Information  Pro-
tection and Statistical Efficiency Act of 2002. It took until 2006 for NSF to establish
a  policy  permit  matching  SDR  data  with  other  sources.  Since  2006,  I  have  drafted
several revisions of the data matching proposal as NSF gathered the necessary data
to make the match a reality. In the interim, the NSF funded a research conference,
‘‘Collaborative Research: Workshop on linking NSF SED/SDR Data to Scientific Pro-
ductivity’’ SRS–0725475 which brought together researchers interested in using the
SDR  Productivity  data,  statistical  experts  on  linking  data  sets,  and  staff  from  the
NSF  Division  of  Science  Resource  Statistics  to  discuss  the  issues  involved  in  cre-
ating the data with the least amount of matching error, ensuring its confidentiality,
and providing access to the research community.3

The  creation  of  the  SDR  Productivity  Database  is  still  a  work  in  progress.  Since
my  original  proposal,  I  have  expanded  the  scope  to  including  matching  the  SDR
with U.S. Patent and Trademark Office patent data as well. I am exploring the pos-
sibility  of  merging  information  from  the  NIH  trainee  database  as  well  as  their
grants database onto the SDR in order to examine the effect of early NIH fellowship
awards  on  later  career  outcomes.  Once  the  data  are  created,  I  plan  to  use  it  to
evaluate  the  gender  gap  in  salary  and  promotion  in  academic  science  in  order  to
draw more definitive conclusions about the explanations for the gap.

Additional data beyond productivity would provide greater insight into the under-
representation  of  women  in  science.  To  understand  the  effect  of  marriage  and  chil-
dren  during  the  post-doctoral  period  on  the  gender  gap  in  obtaining  a  tenure  track
job,  new  questions  would  need  to  be  added  to  the  SDR  survey  instrument.  These
would include:

• Number, length, and institutional affiliation of post-doctoral appointments
• Spouse information including education, employment and earnings
• Childcare and housework time This series of questions would allow research-
ers  to  determine  whether  the  post-doctoral  process,  work-family  tradeoffs,  or
a combination of both lead to fewer women in academic science.

2 Better data does make an important difference. In Ginther and Kahn (2004) we collect publi-
cation data and find that the gender gap in promotion in economics cannot be explained by pro-
ductivity  differences.  These  results  indicate  that  bias  likely  explains  the  gender  promotion  gap
in economics.

3 Information  from  this  conference 

is  available  at  http://www.albany.edu/?marschke/

Workshop/

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

26

In  addition  to  the  SDR,  I  recommend  that  federal  agencies  such  as  the  NSF  and
NIH  work  with  professional  societies  to  collect  information  on  the  demand  for  sci-
entists.  In  particular,  researchers  could  make  use  of  data  on  the  number  of  aca-
demic  and  non-academic  jobs  available  in  scientific  fields.4 Information  on  the  de-
mand for scientists measured by the number of job openings could then be compared
with  the  number  of  doctorates  granted  in  the  Survey  of  Earned  Doctorates.  This
comparison would allow researchers and policy-makers to identify the effect of sup-
ply and demand on the market for scientists.

Workshops on Gender Bias

The  proposed  legislation  mandates  holding  national  workshops  to  educate  grant
review  panels  and  department  chairs  about  methods  that  minimize  the  impact  of
gender  bias  in  evaluation.  These  workshops  are  likely  modeled  after  an  initiative
in  academic  chemistry  departments  (http://www.chem.harvard.edu/groups/friend/
GenderEquityWorkshop/).  The  goal  of  these  workshops  is  to  inform  individuals
about  gender  bias  and  its  impact  with  the  hope  being  that  rational  scientists  who
are  presented  with  research  that  contradicts  their  prior  beliefs  will  change  both
their attitudes and behavior. These changes will then translate into better outcomes
for women in academic science. I strongly support the goal of this initiative.

However,  I  have  a  few  comments  and  concerns  about  this  proposal.  First,  the  ef-
fectiveness  of  the  proposed  workshops  needs  to  be  judged  by  its  impact  on  evalua-
tion outcomes. All too often, people assess attitudes before and after a workshop and
if  the  attitudes  have  changed,  the  workshop  is  judged  a  success.  Attitude  change
is often fleeting, and success should be measured not simply by reference to internal
states but by reference to external outcome variables.

To  evaluate  the  effectiveness  of  the  gender  bias  workshops,  a  valid  research  de-
sign  is  critical.  First,  I  suggest  having  a  treatment  and  control  group  evaluate  the
same  request  for  funds  in  a  funding  panel  setting.  The  funding  agency  could  use
previously evaluated proposals from prior years as the control group and then have
a ‘‘treatment’’ review panel that participated in a gender workshop evaluate the pro-
posals a second time. Any differences in evaluation between the treatment and con-
trol  group  scores  can  then  be  attributed  to  the  gender  bias  workshop—the  ‘treat-
ment.’  Second,  the  review  panel  should  focus  on  funding  for  individuals  such  as
postdoctoral  fellowships.  This  would  reduce  any  bias  related  to  the  quality  of  the
research proposal and would mimic evaluations of individuals that occur throughout
scientific careers (e.g., for promotion and tenure). Researchers should then compare
the  evaluation  scores  of  the  same  proposal  by  the  treatment  and  control  groups.  If
there  are  statistically  significant  differences  in  evaluations,  this  would  be  evidence
that  bias  has  a  causal  effect  on  funding  outcomes.  Once  this  fact  has  been  estab-
lished,  it  would  make  sense  to  implement  these  workshops  as  broadly  as  possible.
A second concern has to do with the problem of motivation among workshop par-
ticipants.  Changing  beliefs  is  difficult,  and  workshops  like  this  will  be  successful  if
the  people  who  attend  are  motivated  by  the  purpose  and  methods.  I  posit  that  this
will  not  be  a  problem  for  grant  review  panelists,  who  are  working  on  behalf  of  the
funding  agencies.  However,  I  remain  skeptical  about  the  workshops’  effectiveness
among department chairs. While this may vary depending on the discipline, in Eco-
nomics  (where  faculty  typically  believe  in  efficient  labor  markets),  department
chairs are likely to be a hostile audience. I think these workshops have to be struc-
tured and participants motivated very carefully to impact these decision-makers.

Third,  my  research  shows  that  women  leave  academic  science  during  the
postdoctoral  period.  Gender  workshops  focused  on  grant  review  panelists  and  de-
partment chairs would seem to miss the most critical group that could affect change
for women in academic science—the post-doctoral supervisors. Thus, it makes sense
that  principle-investigators  who  are  supervising  post-doctoral  students  would  be  an
important target audience for these workshops.

Finally, I recommend that the Subcommittee consider expanding the scope of the
workshops  to  include  mentoring  activities  for  post-doctoral  students  and  junior  fac-
ulty in the science disciplines. COACh in chemistry and CeMENT in economics pro-
vide excellent examples of existing initiatives. I am currently serving as the Coordi-
nator of the CeMENT National mentoring workshops for the Committee on the Sta-
tus of Women in the Economics Profession. These workshops are funded by the NSF
and the American Economic Association and are designed to help junior economists
overcome  the  tenure  hurdle,  with  a  special  focus  on  addressing  the  unique  chal-

4 For  example,  the  American  Economic  Association  publishes  Job  Openings  for  Economists
which  contains  a  monthly  list  of  all  jobs  for  economics  doctorates.  This  information  could  be
compiled annually to get a count of jobs available as a measure of demand for economists.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

27

lenges that women face at the beginning of their careers. The workshops are aimed
at junior faculty in institutions where tenure is primarily based on research output.
At  the  workshops,  participants  are  arranged  into  small  groups  based  on  their  re-
search  areas  and  matched  with  senior  mentors.  The  format  and  curriculum  are  de-
signed  to  create  and  cement  relationships  among  the  participants,  as  well  as  be-
tween  the  participants  and  the  mentors.  Large  group  sessions  address  the  publica-
tion process, grant writing, teaching, professional activities, the tenure process, and
work-life  balance.  Small  group  sessions  consisting  of  researchers  in  the  same  field
provided feedback on junior scholar research papers and grant proposals.

As  with  most  mentoring  workshops,  the  participants  are  pleased  with  the  infor-
mation provided to them. However, the evaluation of the program does not end with
participant surveys.

CeMENT  is  now  in  its  third  wave  of  six  randomized  trials  designed  to  evaluate
the  effect  of  mentoring  on  career  outcomes.  Each  workshop  has  had  over  80  appli-
cants  of  which  approximately  half  are  randomly  invited  to  the  workshop.  The  Ce-
MENT research team follows the CeMENT treatment and control groups for several
years  to  evaluate  whether  or  not  mentoring  has  an  impact  on  publications,  grants,
and  ultimately,  the  tenure  decision.  CeMENT  is  the  only  experimental  evaluation
of  mentoring  that  we  are  aware  of.  We  hope  to  have  preliminary  results  to  report
in the coming year.

The  mentoring  workshops  can  complement  the  proposed  workshops  for  review
panels,  postdoctoral  supervisors,  and  department  chairs.  By  providing  information
and education to both sides of the process, we can have a larger impact and expect
to see more change than addressing either side independently.

Extending Grant Support for Caregiving

Both  the  NSF  and  NIH  provide  for  no-cost  extensions  of  grant  monies.  The  NIH
website indicates that grants can be extended because of caregiving responsibilities
(http://grants.nih.gov/training/faq¥childcare.htm). These practices can and should
be implemented across federal funding agencies.

Federal Role in Gender Equity

Throughout this testimony I have argued for the need for better data to evaluate
gender disparities, more effective evaluation of gender bias workshops, and the addi-
tion  of  mentoring  workshops.  I  will  now  make  specific  recommendations  that  will
allow  the  Federal  Government  to  directly  address  barriers  to  gender  equity  in  aca-
demic science.

1. Provide  grant  support  to  caregivers  through  direct  and  indirect  costs.  Avail-
ability  of  daycare  on  campus  is  in  short-supply.  No  faculty  member  can  be  produc-
tive  if  they  are  preoccupied  with  the  care  of  their  children  while  they  are  at  work.
The  Federal  Government  should  allow  universities  to  count  facilities  for  daycare
provided  on  campus  towards  indirect  costs,  in  particular,  the  number  of  spaces
available for infant care.5 This would provide a subsidy for the expansion of daycare
centers  on  campus  which  would  free  up  the  time  of  caregivers.  In  addition,  I  want
to  echo  Myron  Campbell’s  testimony  before  the  Committee  in  recommending  that
Federal OMB guidelines6 be modified to allow faculty members to charge grants for
the cost of childcare during a conference, or the cost of having small children travel
to  conferences  be  charged  against  direct  or  indirect  grant  costs  (http://demo-
crats.science.house.gov/Media/File/Commdocs/hearings/2007/research/17oct/
Camp bell¥testimony.pdf).

2. Provide financial support for improved data collection and research analysis to
better  understand  gender  disparities  in  academic  science.  The  SDR  Productivity
Database  described  previously  is  very  much  a  work  in  progress.  Additional  funding
could expand the scope of the database and improve its quality. In particular, infor-
mation  on  publications,  citations,  and  patents  should  be  updated  with  each  new
wave  of  the  SDR.  Both  the  NSF  and  President  Bush’s  science  advisor,  John
Marburger,  cite  the  need  to  devise  new  measures  of  the  status  of  science  and  tech-
nology  (S&T)  in  the  economy,  as  it  is  widely  believed  that  current  formulations  in-
sufficiently  represent  current  S&T  practices.  Linking  existing  data  sets  together
provides  several  advantages  in  producing  new  information  on  S&T  because  of  the
time  it  takes  to  implement  changes  to  existing  national  surveys.  I  justify  matching
existing  data  along  a  number  of  dimensions.  First,  innovation  in  the  U.S.  changes

5 According  the  NIH  website  http://grants.nih.gov/training/faq¥childcare.htm,  no  NIH

grantee covers childcare as an indirect cost.

6 http://www.whitehouse.gov/omb/circulars/a021/a021.html

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

28

more  rapidly  than  the  data  are  collected.  Researchers  and  the  NSF  can  save  time
by  matching  existing  data  sets  to  measure  and  understand  changes  in  innovation.
Second, matched data are complementary to and enhance existing national surveys.
The  findings  from  research  using  the  matched  data  can  help  in  reformulating  na-
tional surveys and suggest modules that could explore more fully phenomena discov-
ered  in  the  matched  data.  Third,  matched  data  provide  increased  flexibility  for  re-
search.  Researchers  will  not  need  to  wait  up  to  ten  years  to  gain  access  to  revised
national surveys. Finally, matched data will allow researchers and policy-makers to
examine questions that have not been adequately addressed because of data limita-
tions.

In  addition  to  matched  data,  questions  should  be  added  to  the  SDR  that  directly
address  the  post-doctoral  experience,  education  and  employment  of  the  spouse,  and
time allocated to caregiving duties.

Once  these  data  are  created,  steps  must  be  taken  to  maintain  the  confidentiality
of  the  data  while  providing  broad  access  to  the  research  community.  I  recommend
two approaches to confidentiality. First, synthetic data could be site-licensed to indi-
viduals in research community to allow preliminary estimates to be performed. Sec-
ond,  the  NSF  should  explore  technological  solutions  for  maintaining  the  confiden-
tiality  of  the  SDR  Productivity  Database  such  as  a  virtual  private  network  with
encrypted access. Final estimates could be performed on the secured data.

3. Evaluate gender intervention programs and disseminate best practices. Since its
inception  in  2001,  the  NSF  ADVANCE  program  has  funded  32  institutional  trans-
formation  grants  as  well  as  several  leadership  grants  such  as  the  CeMENT  work-
shops. Each institution has devised interventions to improve the climate, hiring, re-
tention,  and  compensation  of  women  in  science.  This  year,  the  NSF  has  begun  an
evaluation  to  document  the  effectiveness  of  institutional  transformation  programs.
It  is  my  hope  that  the  evaluation  results  in  a  series  of  best-practices  that  can  be
used as a model for other federal agencies.

Conclusion

Mr.  Chairman,  once  again  I  thank  you  for  this  opportunity  to  testify  today.  The
under-representation of women in academic science results from more than implicit
or  explicit  bias.  Although  bias  may  play  a  role,  my  research  suggests  that  the  dif-
ficulties  women  face  in  balancing  work  and  family  and  in  the  post-doctoral  years
cause too many women to leave science. Immediate childcare support on campus for
graduate  students,  post-doctoral  students,  and  faculty,  better  data  and  greater  ac-
cess to the data, and rigorous evaluation of interventions will allow for a more-com-
plete picture of the problem and point to the necessary solutions.

References:
JG  Altonji  and  RM  Blank  (1999).  ‘‘Race  and  Gender  in  the  Labor  Market.’’  Hand-
book  of  Labor  Economics,  Volume  3,  Eds.  O.  Ashenfelter  and  D.  Card.  Amster-
dam: Elsevier Science.

GS  Becker  (1971).  The  Economics  of  Discrimination,  2nd  edition.  Chicago:  Univer-

sity of Chicago Press.

DK Ginther (2001). ‘‘Does Science Discriminate against Women? Evidence from Aca-
demia,  1973–97.’’  Federal  Reserve  Bank  of  Atlanta  Working  Papers  2001,  no.
(2001): 
02 
http://www.frbatlanta.org/publica/work¥papers/wp01/
wp0102.htm

66. 

DK Ginther (2002). ‘‘Gender Differences in Employment Outcomes for Academics in

the Social Sciences.’’ Mimeo, University of Kansas.

DK  Ginther  (2003).  ‘‘Is  MIT  the  Exception?  Gender  Pay  Differentials  in  Academic

Science.’’ Bulletin of Science, Technology, and Society 23(1): 21–26.

DK Ginther (2004). ‘‘Why Women Earn Less: Economic Explanations for the Gender

Salary Gap in Science’’ AWIS Magazine (Winter 2004) 33(1): 6–10.

DK  Ginther  (2004).  ‘‘Gender  Differences  in  Salary  and  Promotion  in  Political

Science.’’ Mimeo, University of Kansas.

DK  Ginther  (2006a).  ‘‘Economics  of  Gendered  Distribution  of  Resources  in  Aca-
deme,’’  in  Biological,  Social,  and  Organizational  Components  of  Success  for
Women  in  Science  and  Engineering:  Workshop  Report.  Committee  on  Maxi-
mizing  the  Potential  of  Women  in  Academic  Science  and  Engineering.  The  Na-
tional Academies Press, Washington, DC. pp. 56–60.

DK  Ginther  (2006b).  ‘‘The  Economics  of  Gender  Differences  in  Employment  Out-
comes  in  Academia,’’  in  Biological,  Social,  and  Organizational  Components  of
Success for Women in Science and Engineering: Workshop Report. Committee on

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

29

Maximizing the Potential of Women in Academic Science and Engineering. The
National Academies Press, Washington, DC. pp. 99–112.

DK  Ginther  (2006c).  ‘‘The  Gender  Gap  in  Science:  Does  Productivity  Explain  the

Difference?’’ Mimeo, University of Kansas.

DK  Ginther  and  KJ  Hayes  (1999).  ‘‘Gender  Differences  in  Salary  and  Promotion  in
the  Humanities.’’  American  Economic  Review  Papers  and  Proceedings  89(2):
397–402.

DK Ginther and KJ Hayes (2003). ‘‘Gender Differences in Salary and Promotion for
Faculty in the Humanities, 1977–1995.’’ The Journal of Human Resources 38(1):
34–73.

DK  Ginther  and  S  Kahn  (2004).  ‘‘Women  in  Economics:  Moving  Up  or  Falling  Off
the Academic Career Ladder?’’ Journal of Economic Perspectives (Summer 2004)
18(3): 193–214.

DK  Ginther  and  S  Kahn  (2006).  ‘‘Women’s  Careers  in  Academic  Social  Science:

Progress, Pitfalls, and Plateaus.’’ Mimeo, University of Kansas.

DK  Ginther  and  S  Kahn  (forthcoming  2009).  ‘‘Does  Science  Promote  Women?  Evi-
dence  From  Academia,  1973–2001’’  in  Science  and  Engineering  Careers  in  the
United  States.  Richard  B.  Freeman  and  Daniel  F.  Goroff  (eds.),  Chicago,  IL:
University  of  Chicago  Press  for  NBER  Science  Engineering  Workforce  Project.
S Kahn and DK Ginther (2007). ‘‘Good Moves: Gender Differences in Academic Mo-

bility in the Sciences and Social Sciences.’’ Mimeo, Boston University.

BIOGRAPHY FOR DONNA K. GINTHER

Donna  Ginther  is  an  Associate  Professor  of  Economics  and  the  Director  of  the
Center  for  Economic  and  Business  Analysis  at  the  Institute  for  Policy  Research  at
the University of Kansas. Prior to joining the University of Kansas faculty, she was
a  research  economist  and  associate  policy  adviser  in  the  regional  group  of  the  Re-
search Department of the Federal Reserve Bank of Atlanta from 2000 to 2002, and
taught  at  Washington  University  from  1997  to  2000  and  Southern  Methodist  Uni-
versity  from  1995  to  1997.  Her  major  fields  of  study  are  scientific  labor  markets,
gender  differences  in  employment  outcomes,  wage  inequality,  scientific  entrepre-
neurship, and children’s educational attainments.

Dr.  Ginther  has  been  published  in  several  journals,  including  the  Journal  of  the
American  Statistical  Association,  Journal  of  Economic  Perspectives,  Demography,
and the Papers and Proceedings of the American Economic Association. She has also
received research funding from the National Science Foundation, the National Insti-
tutes  of  Health,  and  the  Ewing  Marion  Kauffman  Foundation.  She  is  currently  a
member  of  the  Board  of  the  Committee  on  the  Status  of  Women  in  the  Economics
Profession  of  the  American  Economic  Association  in  charge  of  organizing  the  Ce-
MENT national mentoring workshops.

A  native  of  Wisconsin,  Dr.  Ginther  received  her  doctorate  in  economics  in  1995,
Master’s  degree  in  economics  in  1991,  and  Bachelor  of  arts  in  economics  in  1987,
all from the University of Wisconsin–Madison.

DISCUSSION

Chairman  BAIRD.  I  thank  the  witnesses  for  a  very  informative
and concise and relevant testimony. I will recognize myself for five
minutes  and  follow  that  with  Dr.  Ehlers.  We  have  been  joined  by
the way by Dr. Bartlett. Thank you Dr. Bartlett.

Dr. Carlson, one of the questions I have, as you describe the situ-
ation,  it  sounds  like  you  are  gathering  a  fair  bit  of  data,  but  it  is
incomplete  and  variable  across  the  agencies  that  are  submitting
the  data.  You  also  describe  that  you  have  got  a—you  are  in  some
consultative process to try to perhaps improve that set. If that con-
sultative  process  is  successful,  could  you  gather  the  sort  of  data
that  is  requested  in  this  legislation,  and  would  it  be  of  use  to  you
to do so?

Dr. CARLSON. Data on gender and ethnicity and race is—an indi-
vidual  cannot  be  forced  to  provide  that  as  part  of  the  Privacy  Act.
So there is no way that one can compel that. It is actually an issue

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

30

of  working  with  the  individual  agencies  to  have  them  request  the
data  needed,  and  there  is  no  way  that  we  can  actually  push  the
agencies  to  do  that.  I  think  that  really  the  best  way  is  to  work
through  the  Chief  Financial  Officer’s  counsel,  and  that  might  be  a
way to handle that.

Chairman  BAIRD.  Dr.  Blevins,  these  workshops  you  described,  I
was very pleased to hear that you focus on data, research-based in-
formation  about  what  are  the  obstacles  for  women  continuing  the
science  career  path.  We  had  a  prior  hearing  where,  among  others,
Dr.  Shalala  spoke,  and  one  of  the  things  that  came  up  was  the
point you have all made, essentially that really just the number of
baccalaureate  level  folks  is  pretty  good  for  women.  There  is  this
drop  down  the  road  a  ways.  What  specifically  about  your  work-
shops  addresses  that  would  be  one  point,  and  the  second  would  be
if, as this legislation recommends, we would require there be these
training  workshops,  how  would  we  make  sure  that  the  caliber  of
the  workshop  is  good?  I  have  had  the  opportunity  in  my  own  aca-
demic  career  to  participate  in  both  gender  and  ethnic  sensitivity
type  workshops,  and  the  caliber  quite  frankly  varied  a  great  deal.
What are your thoughts on that?

Dr. BLEVINS. Okay. So the first question, what specific about the

workshop addresses this fall off——

Chairman BAIRD. Yeah, the data——
Dr. BLEVINS.—in the statistics?
Chairman  BAIRD.  Specifically  the  research  data  that  tells  us

what causes the fall off. Dr. Ginther pointed a few points out.

Dr.  BLEVINS.  Right.  I  think  the  workshops  focus  on  all  sorts  of
things.  One  is  the  idea  of  implicit  bias  and  gender  schemas,  and
the  other  is  just  sort  of  policies  and  practices  of  the  universities
and the institutions that might not make them very good places to
work. For example, a graduate student might not find a faculty ca-
reer very attractive. That has come up several times because of the
types of policies and practices. One example of that is just a simple
one  which  was  surprising  to  me,  is  when  do  you  hold  your  faculty
meetings?  I  mean,  some  folks  hold  them  on  Saturdays  or,  you
know,  at  5:00  in  the  evening.  And  so  that  is  kind  of  a  simple  one
that  can  sort  of  make  the  environment  better  for  men  and  women
actually. All of these things are really geared toward that.

Chairman  BAIRD.  As  a  father  of  two  twins,  I  appreciate  that,

three-year-old boys.

Dr. BLEVINS. And so it is really a rich format with a very experi-
enced group of department chairs, federal officials, and scientists of
all types. They come together and bring a lot of expertise into these
break-out  sessions.  And  for  example,  at  the  physics  workshop,  one
of  the  universities  talked  about  how  it  was  implementing  a  part-
time  tenure  track.  So  there  are  a  lot  of  interesting  and  different
ideas that come out of them.

How  do  we  keep  the  caliber  of  the  workshops  high  or  how  do
communities  keep  the  caliber?  I  think  the  key  concept  here  is  to
make  them  data-driven  and  to  really  focus  on  data  so  that  people
don’t walk out of the room kind of thinking, well that is somebody
else’s problem and not mine. I think if you really focus on the data
from the social science and whatnot, these people who attend really
take  ownership  I  think  in  this  issue.  And  so,  we  talk  a  lot  about

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

31

how  to  make  them  different  from  what  has  been  held  in  the  past,
and  I  think  it  is  more  than  just  everyone  getting  around,  telling
their  stories  about  how  bad  it  is  for  them.  We  try  to  avoid  that,
and we really try to keep it data-focused.

Chairman  BAIRD.  Sounds  like  you  achieved  that,  and  I  am  sure
Dr.  Ginther,  her  data  set  would  be—Doctor,  your  data  set  seems
quite  relevant  to  that.  One  quick  question,  and  then  I  will  recog-
nize Dr. Ehlers. Has anyone estimated the cost—I support the idea
of considering providing indirect costs for childcare. Have we got an
estimate of the cost of that?

Dr.  GINTHER.  I  checked  with  the  NIH  and  they  say  it  is  permis-
sible  to  use  childcare  facilities  toward  indirect  costs,  though  no
grantees  do  so.  So  I  don’t  know  how  it  would—you  know,  I  don’t
know  the  specifics  of  how  it  would  be  implemented.  It  is  possible,
and I don’t know why other institutions aren’t doing it.

Chairman BAIRD. Dr. Ehlers is recognized.
Mr.  EHLERS.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Dr.  Ginther,  you  rec-
ommend  the  establishment  of  a  valid  research  design  to  measure
the effectiveness of the workshops proposed by this legislation. Can
you suggest how that might be incorporated into the legislation and
would  you  recommend  that  these  workshops  start  out  on  a  pilot
basis with a good evaluation mechanism?

Dr. GINTHER. I think that whenever you are evaluating an inter-
vention, you need to have a treatment and control group. So if you
are  targeting,  say,  grant  reviewers,  you  would  have  a  treatment
group  that  goes  through  the  gender  bias  workshop.  And  then  you
would have a control group that doesn’t, and then they would look
at  the  same  proposal  and  then  you  look  at  the  evaluations  coming
out  of  the  treatment  and  control  group,  compare  the  two,  and  see
whether  or  not  bias  played  a  role  in  the  evaluations,  whether  or
not there were average differences. Women are evaluated better by
the  people  who  have  the  gender  bias  training.  That  would  prove
scientifically that these workshops have a significant effect.

We  are  doing  a  similar  approach  with  our  mentoring  workshops
in  the  American  Economic  Association.  We  have  held  three  so  far,
and  we  have  about  80  participants  who  are  randomly  assigned  to
a  treatment  and  control  group,  and  then  we  look  at  these  young
scholars  as  their  careers  evolve  and  we  see  whether  or  not  the
mentoring  workshops  actually  have  a  significant  effect.  And  then
once  we  have  shown  that  or  failed  to  show  that,  then  we  can  sort
of  say,  these  policies  are  important  and  should  be  disseminated
widely  across  the  disciplines.  But  I  agree  with  Dr.  Blevins’  point,
that  each  discipline  has  a  specific  set  of  issues  and  these  need  to
be discipline-specific in order to be effective.

Mr.  EHLERS.  Another  question.  If  work/family  trade-offs  are  at
least a significant factor, maybe an extremely significant factor, but
the question is, does your research indicate that these trade-off de-
cisions are more acute in science and engineering than in other dis-
ciplines?

Dr.  GINTHER.  I  have  not  evaluated  the  humanities,  but  I  have
evaluated science and social science and I find that women tend to
leave  the  doctorate  and  getting  on  the  tenure  track  in  both  dis-
ciplines. What I have also found is that each discipline is different.
So  in  engineering,  for  example,  you  see  women  entering  tenure-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

32

track  jobs  at  higher  rates  than  men,  but  they  are  more  likely  to
drop  out  of  the  tenure  track  if  they  have  a  child.  So  these  work/
family  trade-offs  really  seem  to  affect  every  woman  in  academia.
But  I  think  they  are  more  likely  to  affect  women  in  that  period  of
purgatory known as the post-doc. You know, you don’t have faculty
status,  you  don’t  have  student  status,  and  it  is  not  clear  whether
or not there is a job going to come out at the other end; and there-
fore,  you  know,  judging  by  what  is  happening  in  the  data,  I  can’t
prove this definitively but judging by what happens, they decide to
opt out.

Mr. EHLERS. Does this happen in the post-doc level?
Dr. GINTHER. Yeah.
Mr. EHLERS.—it is more or less permanent, right?
Dr. GINTHER. Yeah, I mean it is an irrevocable decision.
Mr.  EHLERS.  But  if  they  are  on  tenure  track,  they  may  drop  out

for a few years.

Dr. GINTHER. Now, on the tenure track, I find no significant dif-
ferences in the science of women making it through. So women and
men  are  promoted  to  tenure  and  to  full  professor  at  equal  rates
once  they  get  to  the  tenure  track  in  science.  Not  true  in  social
science.

Mr. EHLERS. I see. That is interesting. So in other words, we sci-

entists are more fair-minded——

Dr.  GINTHER.  I  would  state  it  a  little  differently.  You  scientists
pre-screen your tenure track applicants. There is a screening mech-
anism  called  post-doc,  and  social  scientists  don’t  have  post-docs  on
average.  And  so  then  you  see  the  screening  happening  on  the  ten-
ure track.

Mr.  EHLERS.  Okay.  Sorry.  I  thought  I  had  discovered  something

new. Dr. Blevins——

Chairman BAIRD. I think you were engaging in confirmation bias.
Mr.  EHLERS.  But  I  hide  my  biases  very  well.  I  do  have  lots  of
them.  Dr.  Blevins,  do  you  have  any  indication  that  the  attitude
perception shifts resulting from the workshops resulted or led to in-
stitutional change? Do you follow-up on this?

Dr.  BLEVINS.  In  fact,  follow-up  is  being  done  for  the  chemistry
workshop.  I  have  a  Committee  on  the  Advancement  of  Women
Chemists, and they have an interactive website and they have col-
lected  input.  And  in  fact,  there  have  been  some  anecdotal  pieces
entered  into  the  website  about  some  of  the  changes,  and  I  have
written about some of those in my testimony. Let me see if I can—
I  remember  that  there  were  things  about  changing  the  way  they
interviewed  candidates  and  creating  more  concrete  criteria  by
which  everyone  would  evaluate  the  candidates  in  writing,  working
on  this  childcare  issue,  changing  their  faculty  meeting  times  and
things  like  that.  In  fact,  I  think  nearly  half  of  the  chairs  that  at-
tended have gone in and entered updates to the website two years
later, which is I think a very high success rate.

Mr.  EHLERS.  All  right.  I  think  my  time  has  expired.  I  am  afraid

we have to go vote.

Chairman BAIRD. Yeah, we are down to five minutes voting, and
without boring you with the details of what lies ahead for us, what
lies  ahead  for  you  is  about  a  45-minute  wait.  And  we  regret  that,
but  we  will  likely—I  don’t  foresee  us  likely  coming  back  before

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

33

11:15.  So  let  us  just  give  everybody  that  as  a  predictable  time.  It
is  possible  we  run  over  a  few  minutes,  but  Dr.  Bartlett,  a  couple
minutes.  The  challenge  is  I  don’t  know  how  tight  they  are  holding
the votes right now.

Mr. BARTLETT. Thank you very much. I have a markup in a sub-
committee  so  I  cannot  come  back  after  the  vote.  We  only  have  a
couple  of  minutes  before  we  need  to  run  for  votes.  Anything  that
we  can  do  to  encourage  more  of  our  young  people,  particularly
women, who have largely been under represented in these areas to
go  into  science,  math,  and  engineering  is  enormously  important.  I
just  read  a  statistic  yesterday  that  really  alarmed  me.  Sixty  per-
cent  of  all  of  the  patents  that  come  to  our  patent  office  come  from
inventors outside the United States. This year China will graduate
six times as many engineers as we graduate and more than 50 per-
cent of all of the students in our sciences for post-college education
are  foreign  students.  So  we  face  enormous  challenges,  and  we  just
pretty  much  ignored  a  full  50  percent  of  our  potential  by  not  en-
couraging women to go into these disciplines.

I  am  very  much  concerned  about  any  discrimination,  but  I  am
even  more  concerned  about  a  culture  which  does  not  appreciate
people  in  these  areas.  I  just  think  we  need  to  change  the  culture
so  that  these  careers  are  valued.  Culture  gets  what  it  appreciates,
and  we  just  don’t  appreciate  these  careers.  We  appreciate  singers
and dancers and football players, and so if it was just who gets in-
vited  to  the  White  House  where  they  slobber  all  over  them  rather
than  academic  figures,  they  are  sports  and  entertainers  and  so
forth. Don’t you think we really need a culture change in this coun-
try?  And  you  are  very  effective  representatives,  three  very  attrac-
tive  women,  bright,  and  you  know,  you  just  need  to  be  out  and
about  more  so  that  people  can  see,  gee,  there  really  is  an  oppor-
tunity  for  women  in  these  disciplines,  isn’t  there?  Thank  you  very
much  for  your  testimony.  I  am  sorry  we  don’t  have  more  time  for
conversation. Thank you very much.

Chairman BAIRD. Thank you, Dr. Bartlett. Thank you. Please in-
dulge  with  your  patience.  I  apologize  for  the  interruption.  It  is  be-
yond  our  control.  But  we  will  rush  off  and  vote  and  come  back  as
quickly  as  we  can.  But  I  think  it  is  very  improbable  we  would  be
back before 11:15. So let us make it 11:10 if you would. Let us try
to come back at 11:10 just in case we get lucky early, and then we
will reconvene. Thank you very much.

[Recess.]
Chairman BAIRD. The meeting will now come to order again. We
apologize  profoundly  to  our  witnesses.  It  has  not  been  our  finest
hour  over  on  the  Floor.  A  series  of  procedural  votes  make  it  very
unpredictable. Dr. Ehlers and I have agreed mutually that we have
respect  for  the  witnesses  who  have  traveled  so  far  and  made  such
effort  to  give  us  good  testimony.  We  are  going  to  miss  a  couple  of
votes in order that we can be here and hear from you.

So with that, Dr. Ehlers, I will recognize you because I know you
have  some  further  questions,  and  then  I  will  resume.  We  don’t
have  any  other  with  us.  It  is  possible  that  Eddie  Bernice  Johnson
from Texas will join us as well, but Dr. Ehlers, I will recognize you
for five minutes.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

34

Mr.  EHLERS.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  first  of  all  I  want
to  follow  up  with  several  questions  for  Dr.  Ginther  since  she  trav-
eled a great distance to be here. NSF is working to establish a pro-
ductivity  database.  Once  this  information  is  available,  can  you
speak  to  how  it  will  expand  the  existing  knowledge  base  and  un-
derstanding of the advancement of female faculty members?

Dr.  GINTHER.  If  I  may  sort  of  make  one  small  correction,  I  pro-
posed  to  create  the  productivity  database  with  the  survey  of  doc-
torate  recipients  as  part  of  a  grant  that  I  submitted  in  2004,  and
the  goal  of  creating  this  data  was  to  merge  publications,  citations,
and  patents  onto  the  survey  of  doctorate  recipients,  and  this  is  a
work in progress. But the goal is to see what other factors may ex-
plain why women have not advanced or don’t participate in science
at  the  same  numbers  as  men.  And  so  does  productivity,  for  exam-
ple, explain why women in economics are less likely to get tenure?
How  do  these  other  variables—you  know,  as  economists,  we  as-
sume  that  people  are  paid  and  promoted  based  on  how  productive
they are, and in academia, you can measure productivity much bet-
ter than you can in say the private sector.

So  my  goal  with  the  creation  of  this  data  is  to  see  if  there  are
gender  differences  in  productivity  and  how  they  affect  the  careers
of  men  and  women  in  science.  And  there  are  also  positive
externalities  to  creating  these  data  because  you  can  examine  a
number  of  other  questions,  like  why  has  science  in  the  United
States slowed down in terms of the number of publications relative
to the rest of the world? So the goal is to create the data, and there
is  a  great  interest  in  the  research  community  for  using  it.  And
hopefully  it  will  sort  of  help  us  narrow  down  why  women  are  not
as prevalent in science and social science.

Mr.  EHLERS.  In  a  nutshell,  it  seems  to  me  what  I  have  heard
said  this  morning  is  that  women  are  not  as  productive  or  don’t
seem  to  advance  so  much  primarily  because  of  the  childcare  issue.

Dr. GINTHER. That is what my research indicates, yes.
Mr. EHLERS. Okay. And just a quick question of Dr. Carlson and
Dr.  Blevins.  Do  you  find  that  also  in  your  experience  and  in  the
research you have reviewed?

Dr.  CARLSON.  We  have  not  really  looked  at  that,  so  I  can’t  com-

ment on that.

Mr. EHLERS. Okay. But that indicates that is not a matter of sex-
ual  bias  so  much  as  the  practical  aspect  of  how  is  the  childcare
within the family handled. I am drawing a conclusion. I wanted to
ask you to support or disagree with it.

Dr.  Ginther,  one  other  question  I  had,  including  all  principal  in-
vestigators  in  the  workshops  seems  like  it  would  be  difficult.  Can
you recommend another method to reach the PIs who directly over-
see  post-docs  regarding  improving  the  post  doctoral  experience  for
women?

Dr.  GINTHER.  I  would  say  that,  you  know,  before  you  reach  all
PIs, just do a test, you know, to see if sort of providing them infor-
mation  about  bias  and  other  barriers  that  women  face  in  science
and  in  the  post-doc  period  matters.  Have  a  treatment  and  control
group. And then if it does, then you can sort of selectively identify
PIs, especially those who have a number of post-docs that they su-
pervise and try to disseminate it that way.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

35

So,  you  know,  I  agree  it  would  be  really  prohibitively  expensive
to  train  each  PI,  but  it  would  be  really  useful  to  know  whether  or
not training the PIs would matter, and if it does, you can dissemi-
nate this information to the professional societies and help them to
get the message out.

Mr.  EHLERS.  It  is  not  clear  to  me.  I  really  appreciate  what  you
are  saying.  It  seems  to  me  you  have  got  a  good  handle  on  things,
but  how  would  you  proceed  to  design  pilot  programs  to  institute
this?

Dr. GINTHER. Okay. So you take an agency like NIH which funds
a significant number of post-docs, and you say a condition of fund-
ing is that you take a random sample of 100. You take 50 and you
train  them  and  then  you  take  50  and  you  don’t,  and  then  you  sort
of do a survey and follow up on the progress of their post-doc mix.
And  NIH  gives  millions  of  dollars  for  post-doc  training.  They  have
traineeships and fellowships, and then you can evaluate how these
women and men differentially progress out of the post-doc and into
careers.

Mr.  EHLERS.  That  is  interesting  being  a  physical  scientist,  I
hadn’t thought of NIH as being the first test bed, but you are obvi-
ously right. They have more money for post-docs.

Dr.  GINTHER.  Yeah,  70  percent  of  all  life  scientists  have  to  have
a post-doc before advancing to an academic career. And now I think
the median is more than one.

Mr. EHLERS. Okay. My time has expired. I yield back.
Chairman  BAIRD.  Dr.  Blevins,  did  you  want  to  comment  further
on  the  question  line  that  Dr.  Ehlers  was  pursuing  there?  You
looked like you might have——

Dr.  BLEVINS.  Well,  I  want  to  qualify  that  I  am  also  a  physical
scientist,  not  a  social  scientist,  but  I  think  some  of  the  social  sci-
entists  who  have  spoken  at  our  workshops  might  differ  some  with
what you said. So I would just urge you to talk to some of the folks
who have come to the workshops and spoken as well.

Chairman BAIRD. What would they tell us?
Dr. BLEVINS. Well, I think the issue of implicit bias is something
that  men  and  women  experience  and  hold  and  are  not  always
aware that they do. And these are the things that I learned at the
workshop  from  the  social  scientists.  While  any  one  thing  might
seem  like  a  small  thing  to  which  somebody  might  be  overreacting,
if  you  add  up  the  sum  total  of  all  these  things  over  a  course  of  a
person’s career, there is a concept of accumulation of disadvantage
that  comes  into  play.  So  I  have  to  say  I  am  a  little  uncomfortable
going outside of my comfort zone on this. That is because I am not
a  social  scientist,  but  I  would  just  say  that  the  prevailing  senti-
ment  at  the  workshops  has  been  that  it  is  more  than  just  a
childcare issue.

Chairman  BAIRD.  Hence  we  might  make  some  dent  into—I  am
not  even  sure  retention  is  the  right  word  but  advancement  may
even  be  a  better  word—differentials  if  we  provided  childcare.  But
that  might  not  be  sufficient,  maybe  necessary  but  not  sufficient.
Would that be a fair statement?

Dr.  GINTHER.  I  think  the  issue  is  complex,  you  know.  I  am  not
saying  that  there  is  no  such  thing  as  bias  in  science.  But  for  bias
to  explain  everything,  it  would  have  to  show  up  in  a  lot  more

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

36

places  than  it  does.  You  know,  women  in  science,  once  they  get  on
the tenure track, are equally likely to get tenure and to become full
professor.  But  at  the  full  professor  level,  for  some  reason,  there  is
a 13 percent pay gap that I can’t explain by observable characteris-
tics.  Now  I  don’t  have  every  observable  characteristic.  I  don’t  have
their productivity. And you know, as an economist, we believe peo-
ple  are  paid  according  to  their  productivity.  And  it  is  only  until  I
can disprove that I will even be able to publish this research in the
economics profession.

Chairman  BAIRD.  Well,  you  can  just  prove  that  by  visiting  Con-
gress. Hang around here for a while. You will see that productivity
is not necessarily directly correlated to pay.

Dr. GINTHER. Hey, but your pay is set, right?
Chairman  BAIRD.  Yes,  QED.  The  question  remains.  So  we  have
had  people  tell  us  in  this  committee  that  childcare  is  a  factor  but
there  are  also  cultural  factors,  that  there  are  implicit  biases,  et
cetera. What happens to the women who leave—there is an implicit
assumption  here  it  is  a  bad  thing  to  leave  academia.  Dr.  Ehlers
and  I  might  not  always  agree  with  that.  We’ve  left.  What  happens
to the women who don’t go on into the academic field or the profes-
sional field? It would be one thing if we said, well, X percent higher
numbers  of  women  drop  out  from  that  profession,  and  we  assume
that is a bad thing. But if they go onto things that they personally
deem to be more rewarding, either financially or monetarily, it may
be  a  bad  thing  in  terms  of  lost  productivity,  but  is  it  a  bad  thing
for the women themselves? I am playing devil’s advocate here, you
recognize that. Any thoughts on that?

Dr. GINTHER. This is sort of my area of expertise. What happens
is  if  you  leave  science  or  if  you  leave  any  professional  career,  your
human capital quickly depreciates. And if you want to re-enter the
labor force, you are not going to be able to do so. And I think that
is especially true—and receive the same pay as when you left. And
I  think  that  is  especially  true  in  science  because  science  moves  so
quickly.  If  women  leave  science,  they  are  not  going  to  be  able  to
come  back  and  be  scientists  once  they  leave.  And  so  you  know
there is a loss in human capital.

Chairman BAIRD. But the assumption there is that they go some-
where  that  is  somewhat  of  a  dead  end  instead  of  going  some-
where—for  example,  as  competitive  as  the  field  is  in  the  profes-
sions,  maybe  people—I  am  speculating,  it  may  not  be  true.  Maybe
they  are  leaving  an  academic  career  to  go  to  a  private  enterprise
career,  make  more  money  and  have  more  success.  I  don’t  assume.
Dr.  GINTHER.  I  think  it  is  true  in  certain  disciplines,  like,  you
know,  engineering.  The  track  out  of  a  Ph.D.  in  engineering  is  into
the private sector because the jobs there pay better than academia.
But  some  jobs,  I  mean,  you  can’t  really  do  particle  physics  in  the
private sector. And so as a result, I mean, you kind of have an op-
tion  of  the  labs  at  the  university  or  not  doing  particle  physics.  So
I  can’t  really  comment  on  what  they  end  up  doing,  but  we  see  in
all  levels,  highly  educated  women  are  leaving  the  labor  force  now
outside of academia, and it seems to correlate with having children.
Chairman  BAIRD.  Yeah.  So  we  have  got  to  address  that.  There
is no question. But Dr. Blevins seems to be asserting there is much
more  to  it  than  that,  that  there  are  these  biases,  et  cetera.  So

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

37

hence,  that  is  the  workshop  component  that  is—back  to  this  legis-
lation  per  se,  that  is  the  workshop  component  and  that  is  the  ra-
tionale.  What  is  not  in  this  legislation,  and  Dr.  Ehlers,  I  am  run-
ning  over  here,  but  what  is  not  in  this  legislation  that  you  believe
should be if we are to try to redress some—and obviously the issue
Dr.  Ginther  has  raised  already  about  indirect  costs  for  childcare.
What else is there?

Dr.  GINTHER.  Well,  there  is  how  to  spend  direct  costs  from  your
grants  toward  covering  issues  like  childcare  for  travel.  I  think  Mr.
Campbell testified previously that the R&D rules are too restrictive
about that.

Chairman  BAIRD.  Okay.  Other  thoughts?  Dr.  Ehlers,  I  recognize

you for other questions.

Mr. EHLERS. I have no further questions, Mr. Chairman.
Chairman  BAIRD.  Neither  do  I,  and  with  that,  I  thank  the  wit-
nesses  for  their  patience,  and  we  apologize  for  the  interruptions
and  the  distractions.  It  is  a  difficult  environment.  They  have  not
yet asked Dr. Ehlers or I how we would run the schedule here, but
I can assure you it would be much different.

So thank you for your time and thanks for the guests who joined
us today as well in the audience, and with that, this hearing stands
adjourned.  And  if  people  have  follow-up  comments  they  wish  to
offer, please feel free to do so. Thank you.

[Whereupon, at 11:26 a.m., the Subcommittee was adjourned.]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix 1:

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

(39)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

40

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  Lynda  T.  Carlson,  Director,  Division  of  Science  Resources  Statistics

(SRS), National Science Foundation (NSF)

Questions submitted by Representative Eddie Bernice Johnson
Q1. I  realize  that  your  testimony  specifically  discusses  the  NSF  Division  of  Science
Resources  Statistics,  also  called  the  SRS.  Is  there  cross-talk  between  SRS  and
the Survey of Earned Doctorates, which is currently repressing statistics on mi-
nority Ph.D. grantees? What is being done to rectify this data repression?

A1. The  Division  of  Science  Resources  (SRS)  is  the  federal  statistical  agency  with
responsibility  for  data  and  analysis  on  the  science  and  engineering  enterprise,  writ
large.  As  part  of  that  responsibility  SRS  conducts  the  Survey  of  Earned  Doctorates
(SED), which is a survey of all Ph.D. recipients from U.S. academic institutions.

Last  full  during  a  review  of  its  data  protection  procedures  conducted  in  light  of
newly  issued  guidelines  for  the  Confidential  Information  Protection  and  Statistical
Efficiency  Act  of  2002  (CIPSEA),  SRS  implemented  more  stringent  rules  to  protect
the confidentiality of data provided by respondents to the SED. This additional pro-
tection  resulted  in  a  decrease  in  the  number  of  cells  in  which  data  were  published
in the SED 2006 Summary Report as compared to SED Summary Reports published
in previous years. Tables that individuals special ordered from the survey contractor
also had fewer cells with published data. The cells affected related primarily to race/
ethnicity, citizenship and gender.

After  publishing  the  2006  SED  tabulations,  NSF/SRS  received  many  complaints
from  the  user  community  about  the  availability  of  less  information  for  under-rep-
resented  minorities  than  previously  released.  A  great  deal  of  the  concern  related  to
the fact that SRS implemented the changes without input from the user community.
Users  strongly  suggested  that  SRS  solicit  user  input  as  to  how  best  to  design  the
tables  to  meet  a  broad  spectrum  of  user  needs.  NSF  has  listened  to  this  concern.
The following statement was released by NSF in May:

‘‘SRS  will  be  releasing  the  race/ethnicity,  citizenship  and  gender  data  collected
for the 2006 Survey of Earned Doctorates (SED) as in previous years. There are
privacy  and  confidentiality  issues  that  must  be  addressed,  particularly  in  the
context  of  small  data  sets.  The  question  of  how  to  aggregate  the  data  in  future
years will be addressed with the data user community over the next few months
and new tables will be developed to release data from the 2007 SED.’’

Tables  containing  2006  SED  data  with  the  same  level  of  detail  as  in  previous
years  for  race/ethnicity,  citizenship  and  gender  can  be  requested  through  a  link  on
the  NSF/SRS  website  at  http://www.nsf.gov/statistics/srvydoctorates/2006/
sed06data.htm.

The  same  web  page  has  a  comment  box  requesting  suggestions  for  ways  to  rede-
sign  the  SED  data  tables  so  that  they  will  address  both  issues  of  privacy/confiden-
tiality  and  the  needs  of  data  users.  SRS  is  also  asking  interested  parties  to  take
part  in  a  web  survey  on  the  redesign  of  the  SED  data  tables.  We  hope  that  inter-
ested  parties  will  avail  themselves  of  both  the  comment  box  and  the  web  survey  to
help  SRS  redesign  the  tables.  SRS  is  also  engaging  in  an  extensive  outreach  effort
to solicit information about the ways in which SED data are used and to garner sug-
gestions for alternative ways to present the data.

NSF/SRS  understands  the  importance  of  reporting  on  the  progress  of  under-rep-
resented minorities in science and engineering (S&E). This consideration will guide
the  development  of  alternative  data  displays  that  will  document  the  role  of  under-
represented minorities in S&E and the redesign of tables to display this information
to the maximum extent possible.

To  meet  the  needs  of  users  for  2007  data  from  the  SED  on  a  similar  schedule  as
in  previous  years,  SRS  will  release  in  late  2008  high-level  summary  statistics  of
2007 SED data in an InfoBrief (see htt;://www.nsf.gov/statistics/infbrief/nsf08301/
for the 2006 InfoBrief). Concurrently SRS will be redesigning the tables for the full
2007 SED Summary report, which is planned for release in spring 2009.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

41

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses by Linda G. Blevins, Senior Technical Advisor, Office of the Deputy Direc-

tor for Science Programs, U.S. Department of Energy

Questions submitted by Representative Eddie Bernice Johnson
Q1. Dr.  Ginther  expressed  concern  about  motivation  among  workshop  participants.
She cites her own discipline, economics, as being particularly hostile to this kind
of workshop. Did you find this to be a problem at all in the workshops that you
participated  in?  Are  there  best  practices  specifically  to  overcome  any  reluctance
on the part of invited participants?

A1. For  the  chemistry  and  physics  workshops,  some  department  chairs  were  moti-
vated  to  attend  and  some  were  not.  Each  chair  was  first  contacted  by  a  steering
committee member. The steering committee members were able to use their consid-
erable  influence  in  the  scientific  community  to  convince  most  department  chairs  to
attend;  however,  a  few  were  reluctant.  The  reluctant  participants  were  then  con-
tacted  by  the  federal  program  managers  in  the  sponsoring  agencies;  some  were
called  several  times.  Convincing  the  last  few  chairs  to  attend  required  a  great  deal
of work by both the steering committees and the federal advisors.
Q2. How often do you think that gender bias workshops should be held for each dis-
cipline  in  order  for  attitudinal  changes  to  spread  throughout  the  community,
and not just among the department chairs who participate directly in the work-
shops?

A2. We do not currently have enough data to make this prediction. To date, no com-
munity has held more than one gender equity workshop. The workshops have been
driven  and  owned  by  the  communities,  and  the  communities  are  currently  exam-
ining  their  outcomes.  The  assessment  results  from  the  first  round  of  workshops
should inform decisions of whether or not to hold follow-on workshops.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

42

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  Donna  K.  Ginther,  Associate  Professor,  Department  of  Economics;  Di-

rector, Center for Economic and Business Analysis, University of Kansas

Questions submitted by Representative Eddie Bernice Johnson
Q1. Can you propose more specifically how universities can count childcare facilities

toward indirect costs?

A1. Availability of daycare on campus is in short-supply. No faculty member can be
productive  if  they  are  preoccupied  with  the  care  of  their  children  while  they  are  at
work.  Some  institutions  include  on-site  childcare  as  a  fringe  benefit,  which  for
grants  purposes  is  considered  a  direct  cost.1 However,  in  practice,  the  number  of
childcare  spaces  on  campus  is  so  limited  that  enrolling  a  child  in  daycare  is  akin
to  winning  the  lottery.  Furthermore,  if  on-site  childcare  is  available,  often  it  is  for
children  who  are  one  year  or  older.  Infant  daycare  slots  are  extremely  difficult  to
come by.

The  Federal  Government  can  create  incentives  for  on-site  childcare  by  allowing
universities  to  count  childcare  facilities,  building  depreciation,  and  operation  and
maintenance  as  part  of  indirect  costs  associated  with  grants.  According  to  the  NIH
website  (http://grants.nih.gov/training/faq¥childcare.htm):  ‘‘The  HHS  Division  of
Cost  Accounting  found  that  many  grantees  offer  subsidized  child  care  centers  and
have negotiated costs associated with such centers into their employee benefit rates.
No grantee was identified that covers such costs through indirect costs.’’ This state-
ment  indicates  that  it  might  be  possible  for  universities  to  include  childcare  space
available on campus in their calculation of indirect costs.

My  sense  is  that  funding  agencies  such  as  NSF  and  NIH  would  need  to  be  in-
structed  by  OMB  to  allow  childcare  space  to  count  toward  indirect  costs  in  much
the same way that these costs are calculated for laboratory space. Since infant care
is  a  crucial  issue  for  most  faculty  (and  in  the  shortest  supply),  the  availability  of
infant  spaces  should  be  counted  at  a  higher  indirect  cost  rate  than  spaces  for  older
children.

If universities were allowed and encouraged to count childcare spaces towards in-
direct  costs,  this  would  provide  a  subsidy  to  the  provision  of  childcare  on  campus.
It  would  benefit  all  faculty,  but  would  likely  benefit  female  faculty  more  since  on
average they shoulder the burden of caregiving responsibilities.
Q2. Would childcare be listed as an individual investigator cost? I can tell you that
some Science Committee Members as well as the public would be displeased that
research  monies  are  being  spent  on  childcare.  Can  you  suggest  a  tenable  alter-
native?

A2. I  would  not  recommend  listing  childcare  as  an  individual  investigator  cost.  All
U.S. taxpayers receive tax breaks for childcare expenses. Allowing individual inves-
tigators to charge grants directly for all childcare expenses would be a huge subsidy
to individual investigators relative to the average worker. The primary beneficiaries
would likely be male investigators with children.

However, I support Myron Campbell’s testimony before the Committee which rec-
ommended  that  Federal  OMB  guidelines2 be  modified  to  allow  faculty  members  to
charge  grants  for  the  cost  of  childcare  during  a  conference,  or  the  cost  of  having
small children travel to conferences be charged against direct or indirect grant costs
(http://democrats.science.house.gov/Media/File/Commdocs/hearings/2007/re-
search/17oct/Campbell¥testimony.pdf).  It  is  very  difficult  to  attend  conferences
when  an  investigator  has  small  children.  Speaking  from  personal  experience,  when
I  have  attended  conferences  my  husband  and  I  have  paid  for  our  parents  to  come
to  our  house  to  help  with  the  children.  Fortunately,  we  have  the  funds  to  cover
these  expenses.  However,  most  individual  investigators  are  not  so  lucky.  Thus,  the
only  direct  childcare  costs  charged  to  grants  would  be  for  out-of-town  travel  either
to pay for childcare when an investigator is attending a conference or to pay for chil-
dren to travel to conferences with their investigator-parent. Currently, investigators
can  charge  travel  expenses  towards  research  grants.  Allowing  these  additional
charges would just increase the travel portion of the researcher’s budget.

1 In the University of Kansas F&A agreement, on-site childcare is not counted as a fringe ben-

efit.

2 http://www.whitehouse.gov/omb/circulars/a021/a021.html

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix 2:

ADDITIONAL MATERIAL FOR THE RECORD

(43)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

44

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

45

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

46

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

47

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

48

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

49

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

50

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

51

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

52

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

53

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

54

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

55

Æ

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:18 Oct 11, 2008 Jkt 042121 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\050808\42121 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

